Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB502.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding KRS 48.110, 48.300, and 176.430, the projects authorized by the General
Assembly in this Act constitute the official 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan.
Section 2. The General Assembly acknowledges that the project authorizations contained within this Act
are based on the Transportation Cabinet's estimates. The Transportation Cabinet shall have the authority to expend
funds necessary to complete the projects as authorized in this Act, amended only by variations dictated by bid or
unforeseen circumstances.
Section 3. The Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall produce a single document that shall detail
the enacted fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Program, the 2028-2032 Highway
Preconstruction Program, and the Local Assistance Road Program.
Section 4. Notwithstanding KRS 48.300, this Act in conjunction with 2026 Regular Session HJR 75 and
HJR 76 shall constitute the Six-Year Road Plan.
Section 5. Whereas the funding for these projects is provided by the Transportation Cabinet Budget Bill,
which takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Section 6. The 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan is as follows:
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Adair 4325 KY-1702 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1702 IN ADAIR COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 58,000
Project Cost: 58,000 0 0
Adair 22207 LN-9008 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Louie B. Nunn Cumberland Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 43.02 TO MILEPOINT 48.15 DN NHPM 200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0
Adair 80352 KY-55 Improve mobility and congestion along KY 55 from US 127 in Russell PL SPP 400,000
County to the Louis B. Nunn Cumberland KY 55/KY6177 in Adair DN
County. (Russell MP 0.0 - 8.159; Adair MP 0.0 - 9.68) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 0 0
Adair 80411 KY-55 Improve horizontal and vertical geometrics along KY 55 from 0.113 mile PL
South of Tom Andrews Rd to 0.107 mile North of Tom Andrews Rd. DN SPP 110,000
(MP 8.631 to 8.85) RW SPP 220,000
UT SPP 220,000
CN
Project Cost: 110,000 440,000 0
Adair 80412 KY-61 Reconstruction KY 61 from Columbia Bypass (KY 55) to Green County PL
Line. See Alternate 4 Priority Section in December 2002 scoping study. DN SPP 3,766,000
(MP 12.213 to 19.745) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,766,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 3
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Adair 80413 PF-9999 The proposed roadway would help alleviate traffic on existing KY 206, PL SPP 250,000
KY3491, as well as traffic thru town on KY 55X and KY80. Eastern DN
Columbia Bypass RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 250,000
Adair 80418 CS-1110 Address flooding issues on Rice Drive (CS 1110) and Watson Street PL
(CS 1139) , Memorandum of Agreement with City of Columbia to DN SPP 102,000
construct RW
UT
CN SPP 511,300
Project Cost: 0 613,300 0
Total for Adair county PL 400,000 250,000
DN 110,000 4,068,000
RW 220,000
UT 220,000
CN 58,000 2,511,300
Total Amounts: 568,000 7,019,300 250,000
Allen 320 KY-100 IMPROVEMENTS TO KY 100: CURVE, BRIDGE, AND INTERSECTION PL
IMPROVEMENTS FROM NEAR THE STONY POINT ROAD DN
INTERSECTION TO EAST OF THE ALONZO LONG HOLLOW ROAD RW
INTERSECTION (12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SPP 11,780,000
Project Cost: 11,780,000 0 0
Allen 10026 CR-1043 BRIDGE PROJECT IN ALLEN COUNTY ON (002C00004N) JEFFERSON PL
SCHOOL R AT DIFFICULT CREEK DN FBP2 139,182
RW
UT
CN FBP2 927,878
Project Cost: 0 0 1,067,060

4 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Allen 80206 KY-100 RECONSTRUCT KY-100 FROM KY-622 IN SIMPSON COUNTY TO EST PL
OF SULPHUR FORK CREEK IN ALLEN COUNTY (2012CCR) (2022CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 19,140,000
Project Cost: 19,140,000 0 0
Allen 80312 PF-9999 Improve connectivity within Allen Springs Industrial Park. (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW STP2 110,000
UT STP2 260,000
CN STP2 2,700,000
Project Cost: 110,000 260,000 2,700,000
Total for Allen county PL
DN 139,182
RW 110,000
UT 260,000
CN 30,920,000 3,627,878
Total Amounts: 31,030,000 260,000 3,767,060
Anderson 8100.1000 US-62 WIDENING WITH ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS TO ANDERSON CROSSING PL
ON US62, FROM 0.2MI W OF CORPORATE DR TO US127B DN
(LAWRENCEBURG BYPASS). PRIORITY SECTION (2016BOP) RW STP1 5,040,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,040,000 0
Anderson 10065 KY-44 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 44 OVER TIMBER CREEK PL
(003B00028N) DN BRX 237,733
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,584,890
Project Cost: 0 0 1,822,623

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 5
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Anderson 22183 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 56.287 TO MILEPOINT 58.345 DN NHPM 200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,003,520
Project Cost: 0 2,203,520 0
Anderson 80001 US-62 IMPROVE US-62 (VERSAILLES RD.) FROM HILLTOP DR. TO WEST END PL
OF BRIDGE OVER KENTUCKY RIVER AT TYRONE(18CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT STP2 5,850,000
CN
Project Cost: 5,850,000 0 0
Total for Anderson county PL
DN 200,000 237,733
RW 5,040,000
UT 5,850,000
CN 2,003,520 1,584,890
Total Amounts: 5,850,000 7,243,520 1,822,623
Ballard 118 US-60 Improve US-60 from Humphrey Creek bridge to 0.4 mi west of Hester PL
Sullivan Lane. (02CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT NH 10,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 10,000,000 0
Ballard 1140 US-51 CONSTRUCT NEW STRUCTURE OVER THE OHIO RIVER AT CAIRO, PL
ILLINOIS (KENTUCKY'S SHARE)(004B00021N) DN BRO2 4,000,000 4,500,000 3,005,000
RW
UT
CN BRO2 26,365,000
Project Cost: 4,000,000 30,865,000 3,005,000

6 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Ballard 1140.2000 US-51 CONSTRUCT APPROACH ROADWAY TO NEW BRIDGE OVER THE PL
OHIO RIVER AT CAIRO, ILLINOIS (KY APPROACH ROADWAY WORK DN
ONLY). RW
UT
CN NH 14,620,000
Project Cost: 0 14,620,000 0
Ballard 80300 US-60 ADDRESS CONDITION, SAFETY, CONGESTION, AND FUTURE PL
CAPACITY ISSUES ON US-60 THROUGH THE CITY OF LACENTER. DN
(2024CCN) RW NH 2,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,750,000 0
Ballard 80308 US-51 CORRECT ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, INADEQUATE PASSING ZONES, PL
IMPROVE OPERATING SPEEDS AND IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM DN NH 1,560,000
CARLISLE COUNTY LINE TO RAILROAD OVERPASS IN WICKLIFFE. RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Ballard 80320 US-51 THE PURPOSE OF THIS PROJECT IS TO PROVIDE ROADWAY PL
INFRASTRUCTURE TO SUPPORT COMMUNITY DN STP2 300,000
GROWTH/DEVELOPMENT AND SAFE ACCESS FOR FREIGHT TRAFFIC RW
TO DEVELOPING RIVERPORT SOUTH OF WICKLIFFE. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 300,000 0
Ballard 80322 KY-286 IMPROVE GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, FREIGHT TRUCK MOBILITY, AND PL
IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 286 FROM HERSHEL JONES ROAD TO KY DN SPP 1,500,000
473.(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Total for Ballard county PL
DN 4,000,000 7,860,000 3,005,000
RW 2,750,000
UT 10,000,000
CN 40,985,000
Total Amounts: 4,000,000 61,595,000 3,005,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 7
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Barren 186 KY-249 Widen KY 249 from Hilltopper Way to Trojan Trail PL
DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,150,000
Project Cost: 0 4,150,000 0
Barren 8821 CR-1366, IMPROVE KY-1297 FROM CR-1366 (DONNELLY DRIVE) TO US-31E PL
KY-1297 (ROGER WELLS), AND IMPROVE CR-1366 (DONNELLY DRIVE) FROM DN
KY-1297 TO US-68 IN GLASGOW. (14CCN) (16CCN) (2020CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN CRP 13,440,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,440,000
Barren 10001 US-31 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF US 31EX BRIDGE OVER WATER STREET. PL
(005B00058N) DN
RW BRX 1,000,000
UT BRX 550,000
CN BRX 2,900,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 550,000 2,900,000
Barren 20038 US-31 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-31E FROM MILEPOINT 8.052 TO PL
MILEPOINT 12.117 DN STP4 160,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,840,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Barren 22300 US-68 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-68X FROM MILEPOINT 2.75 TO PL
MILEPOINT 4.27 DN STP3 640,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 7,360,000
Project Cost: 8,000,000 0 0

8 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Barren county PL
DN 800,000
RW 1,000,000
UT 550,000
CN 9,200,000 4,150,000 16,340,000
Total Amounts: 11,000,000 4,700,000 16,340,000
Bath 4327 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN BATH COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 46,000
Project Cost: 46,000 0 0
Bath 10067 US-60 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BATH COUNTY ON (006B00012N) US-60 AT PL
DRAINAGE DITCH DN BRX 357,929
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,386,193
Project Cost: 0 0 2,744,122
Bath 10068 US-60 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BATH COUNTY ON (006B00013N) US-60 AT PL
CROOKED RUN CREEK DN BRX 366,778
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,445,188
Project Cost: 0 0 2,811,966
Bath 10095 US-60 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 60 OVER COW CREEK PL
(006B00011N) DN BRX 144,243
RW
UT
CN BRX 961,619
Project Cost: 0 0 1,105,862

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 9
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bath 22045 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 117.83 TO PL
MILEPOINT 123.6 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 5,400,000 0
Bath 22046 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 123.6 TO MILEPOINT PL
128.955 DN NHPM 450,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,521,000
Project Cost: 4,971,000 0 0
Bath 80101 KY-36 IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 36 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH I-64 TO PL
THE INTERSECTION OF KY 965 INCLUDING THE CURVES KNOWN AS DN
CLEAR CREEK FURNACE AND THOMAS HILL (2020CCN) MILEPOINT RW SPP 1,650,000
13.394 TO MILEPOINT 17.104 (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,650,000 0 0
Total for Bath county PL
DN 450,000 490,000 868,950
RW 1,650,000
UT
CN 4,567,000 4,910,000 5,793,000
Total Amounts: 6,667,000 5,400,000 6,661,950
Bell 167 KY-74 ENHANCING CUMBERLAND AVENUE FROM US 25E TO 18TH STREET PL
WITH STREET IMPROVEMENTS FOR VEHICLE AND PEDESTRIANS, AS DN
WELL AS STORM WATER MANAGEMENT TO IMPROVE SAFETY, RW SPP 580,000
CONGESTION, AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT. (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 580,000 0 0

10 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bell 4395 KY-2011 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2011 IN BELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Bell 4397 KY-66 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-66 IN BELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Bell 10171 KY-66 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BELL COUNTY ON (007B00055N) KY-66 AT RED PL
BIRD CREEK DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 1,046,035
Project Cost: 0 0 1,066,035
Bell 10239 KY-217 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BELL COUNTY ON (007C00072N) 17TH STREET PL
AT YELLOW CREEK DN FBP2 202,446
RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,349,640
Project Cost: 0 0 1,552,086
Bell 22303 US-119 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-119 FROM MILEPOINT 13.88 TO PL
MILEPOINT 15.88 DN STP5 318,364
RW
UT
CN STP5 3,661,186
Project Cost: 0 3,979,550 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 11
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bell 80300 US-119 Improve mobility by constructing a 2+1 road on US 119 in Bell County PL
by adding a continuous third lane that serves as an alternate passing DN NH 2,330,000
lane (MP 3.5 - 9.3). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,330,000 0
Bell 80421 US-25 Improve safety at existing Bell County School Bus Garage, construct PL
turn lane and acceleration lane on US 25E (MP 10.18 to 10.28 DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 150,000
Project Cost: 0 0 150,000
Total for Bell county PL
DN 2,648,364 202,446
RW 580,000 10,000
UT 10,000
CN 190,000 3,661,186 2,545,675
Total Amounts: 770,000 6,309,550 2,768,121
Boone 80 I -75 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVE TRAFFIC MOBILITY AT THE PL
INTERCHANGE OF I-75 AND KY-14 IN WALTON. (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW NH 7,250,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 7,250,000 0 0
Boone 966.0800 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL-AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR NKY PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY 2026 DN
THROUGH FY 2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT RW
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000
Project Cost: 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000

12 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 1087 KY-842 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE OVER NS (CNO&TP)RR ON PL
RICHARDSON ROAD (KY 842) 0.14 MI E OF US 25 NEAR DN
INDEPENDENCE (008B00092N) (2020CCN) RW BRX 4,000,000
UT BRX 3,775,000
CN BRX 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 17,775,000 0
Boone 10028 I -275 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON I-275 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(008B00052N) DN FBP 520,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,200,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,720,000
Boone 10049 KY-14 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 14 OVER MCCOYS FORK PL
(008B00003N) DN BRX 211,800
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,411,999
Project Cost: 0 0 1,623,799
Boone 80101 KY-18 CONVERT KY 18 (BURLINGTON PIKE) TO A SUPER STREET PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 9,500,000
Project Cost: 9,500,000 0 0
Boone 80150 KY-717 Reconstruct Turfway Road (KY 717) from Aero Parkway (MP 0.0) to PL
Donaldson Road (MP 1.67). (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 13
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80207 CR-1001 Improve safety & mobility, reduce congestion and address geometric PL
deficiencies along Camp Ernst Road (CR 1001) from KY 237 (Pleasant DN
Valley Rd) to KY 536 (Hathaway Rd). (2022CCN) (Includes Item No. RW STPF 7,250,000
6-80208) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 7,250,000 0 0
Total for Boone county PL
DN 731,800
RW 14,500,000 4,000,000
UT 3,775,000
CN 18,100,000 23,600,000 20,211,999
Total Amounts: 32,600,000 31,375,000 20,943,799
Bourbon 80104 US-460 IMPROVE US 460 FROM RUSSELL CAVE RD TO I 75 (2ND PART OF PL
7-8705) (2020CCN)(SEE 7-8705.10) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 8,200,000
Project Cost: 8,200,000 0 0
Bourbon 80203 KY-1939 MODERNIZE ROADWAY, IMPROVE CONGESTION, SAFETY AND PL
PEDESTRIAN ACCESS FROM US 27 ALONG Y 1939 FOR .212 MILES DN
INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS TO THE INTERSECTION OF MATLACK ST RW STPF 740,000
AND THE BOURBON COUNTY SCHOOL BUS BARN (2022CCN)
UT STPF 1,150,000
(INCLUDES ITEM NO. 7-916) (2024CCR)
CN STPF 2,240,000
Project Cost: 740,000 3,390,000 0
Bourbon 80361 KY-1893 Replace bridge on KY 1893 (Shawhan Rd) over Stoner Creek. PL
(009B00041N) DN FBP2 325,909
RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,172,724
Project Cost: 0 0 2,498,633

14 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Bourbon county PL
DN 325,909
RW 740,000
UT 1,150,000
CN 8,200,000 2,240,000 2,172,724
Total Amounts: 8,940,000 3,390,000 2,498,633
Boyd 208.0600 CO-0 FEDERAL 'STP' FUNDS DEDICATED TO HUNTINGTON-ASHLAND MPO PL
FOR FY 2022-2028. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT DN
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000
Project Cost: 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000
Boyd 10016 I -64 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES ON PERRY GENTRY BRIDGES OVER THE BIG PL
SANDY RIVER. JOINT PROJECT WITH WEST VIRGINIA. (010B00046L DN FBP 200,000
AND 010B00046R)(SD) RW
UT
CN FBP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,200,000
Boyd 10074 US-23 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BOYD COUNTY ON (010B00058N) US-23S AT PL
OHIO RIVER,CSX,STREETS DN BRO 260,000
RW
UT
CN BRO 2,600,000
Project Cost: 0 2,860,000 0
Boyd 10096 US-23 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 23 OVER OHIO RIVER,CSX PL
,STREETS (010B00040N) DN BRZ 200,000
RW
UT
CN BRZ 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 15
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boyd 80353 PF-9999 Construct a new bridge over the Little Sandy River and construct a PL
roadway from the south side of Camp Landing. Project to be complete DN SPP 1,000,000
through a Memorandum of Agreement with Boyd County, state funds RW
contingent on the completion of transfer of ownership of all right of
UT
way necessary for the project to the Boyd County Fiscal Court. The
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 0 0
Total for Boyd county PL
DN 1,000,000 460,000 200,000
RW
UT
CN 1,800,000 6,400,000 3,800,000
Total Amounts: 2,800,000 6,860,000 4,000,000
Boyle 473 US-127, US 150 Bypass between Fireside Dr and Gose Pike in Danville, PL
US-150 Kentucky; City of Danville’s SS4A USDOT Grant Funded Project. DN KYD 2,190,000
RW
UT
CN KYD 13,760,000
Project Cost: 15,950,000 0 0
Boyle 80204 KY-52 RECONSTRUCT KY 52 FROM KY 1805 (Goggin Ln) TO KY 590 PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP2 2,510,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,510,000 0 0
Boyle 80313 KY-52 PLANNING STUDY TO EVALUATE OPTIONS FOR IMPROVING SAFETY PL
ON KY 52 BETWEEN DANVILLE AND LANCASTER. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,950,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,950,000 0 0

16 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boyle 80354 US-68 Improve the existing geometry and typical section of US 68 from PL
approx. MP 5.2 to MP 6.39 at the intersection of 2nd Street in Perryville DN SPP 780,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 0
Boyle 80425 KY-2168 Intersection Improvements at KY 2168/US 127 and KY 2168/KY34 (MP PL
O to 3.088) DN SPP 500,000
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 900,000 0
Total for Boyle county PL
DN 4,140,000 1,280,000
RW 2,510,000 250,000
UT 150,000
CN 13,760,000
Total Amounts: 20,410,000 1,680,000 0
Bracken 355.2200 KY-8 OPERATION OF AUGUSTA FERRY FOR FY 2027 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(12CCR)(14CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 537,000 338,000
Project Cost: 0 537,000 338,000
Bracken 8902 KY-9 Add turn lanes on KY 9 (AA Hwy) at the KY 875 (Mt Zion Road) PL
intersection to improve safety and mobility. (SYP 6-8902) (MP 7.6 to DN SPP 20,000
7.9) RW SPP 20,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN SPP 170,000
Project Cost: 20,000 310,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 17
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Bracken county PL
DN 20,000
RW 20,000
UT 120,000
CN 707,000 338,000
Total Amounts: 20,000 847,000 338,000
Breathitt 5014 KY-15 ROCKFALL MITIGATION ON KY 15 FROM 0.593 MILE NORTH OF PL
BEAVERLY ROAD (MP 13.750) TO KY 1098/KY 1813 (MP 14.644). DN
(2018BOP) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN KYD 24,490,000
PROT 9,510,000
Project Cost: 34,000,000 0 0
Breathitt 80411 KY-1110 Improve reliability of KY 1110 between MP 14 and MP 15. PL
DN SPP 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Total for Breathitt county PL
DN 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN 34,000,000
Total Amounts: 34,000,000 1,000,000 0
Breckinridge 159 KY-86 REALIGN KY 86 FROM JESSIE PRIEST ROAD TO EAST OF ROSETTA PL
CORNERS. (2020CCR) ($2 MILLION CONGRESSIONAL EARMARK DN
DEMO ID KY188) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN CRP 8,100,000
Project Cost: 0 8,100,000 0

18 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Breckinridge 8902 KY-261 REPLACE LOW WATER STRUCTURE ON KY 261 AT MP 15.74. PL
(18CCN) DN BRX 100,000
RW BRX 25,000
UT BRX 25,000
CN BRX 400,000
Project Cost: 0 0 550,000
Total for Breckinridge county PL
DN 100,000
RW 25,000
UT 25,000
CN 8,100,000 400,000
Total Amounts: 0 8,100,000 550,000
Bullitt 150.0200 KY-44 RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM I 65 TO CHIMNEY ROCK DRIVE PL
(MILEPOINT 13.1 TO MILEPOINT 15.1). (2022CCN) DN SPP 2,420,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,420,000 0
Bullitt 150.5000 KY-44 SECTION 5 FROM CS 3316/CS 3628 TO US 31E BYPASS (2008BOPC) PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,720,000
UT SPP 610,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,720,000 610,000
Bullitt 347.5000 KY-44 MT. WASHINGTON-TAYLORSVILLE RD; RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM PL
US31E BYPASS TO KY 1319 KINGS CHURCH HIGHWAY (2020CCN) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 4,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,500,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 19
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 578 I -65 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-65 SB WELCOME CENTER. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 0 1,160,000 0
Bullitt 4309 KY-1319 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1319 IN BULLITT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Bullitt 8307.2000 KY-245 WIDEN KY-245 FROM FLAGET HOSPITAL (MP 7.722) THROUGH PL
COUNTY LINE (MP12.261 NELSON/MP0.000 BULLITT) TO HAPPY DN
HOLLOW RD (MP 4.425). (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,250,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,250,000 0
Bullitt 10143 KY-2674 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 2674 OVER WHITTAKER PL
RUN (015B00083N) DN BRZ 440,483
RW
UT
CN BRZ 2,936,554
Project Cost: 0 0 3,377,037
Bullitt 22067 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 110.7 TO MILEPOINT PL
118.58 DN NHPM 7,200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 30,000,000
Project Cost: 37,200,000 0 0

20 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 80101 KY-1450 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON KY 1450 (BLUE PL
LICK RD.) BETWEEN THE INTERSECTIONS WITH KY 1526 (JOHN DN
HARPER HIGHWAY) AND CR 1512A (JEFFIE LANE) (2020CCN) RW SPP 1,800,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 0
Bullitt 80103 KY-44 RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM BOGARD LANE TO ARMSTRONG LANE PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN SPP 2,670,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,670,000 0
Bullitt 80354 US-31 Improve traffic operations and improve safety along US 31E PL
(Louisville-Bardstown Rd) from the Bullitt/Nelson County Line to KY 44. DN STPF 1,670,000
Consider a 2+1 configuration and/or innovative intersections (MP 0.0 - RW
3.53 Bullitt; MP 0.0 - 1.882 Spencer). (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,670,000 0
Bullitt 80412 KY-44 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 44 between the I-65 PL
interchange and the KY 61 intersection. Consider access DN SPP 130,000
management. RW SPP 125,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 130,000 125,000 0
Bullitt 80429 KY-61 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 61 from KY 44 in PL SPP 250,000
Shepherdville to KY 245. Project will evaluate widening from 2 to 4 DN
travel lanes and consider other lower impact alternatives. (MP RW
9.42-14.5)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 21
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 80430 KY-61 Improve safety, improve traffic operations, and enhance mobility on PL SPP 400,000
KY 61 from the Bullitt/Nelson County Line to KY 245. (MP 0 - 9.42) DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 0 0
Total for Bullitt county PL 650,000
DN 7,330,000 6,760,000 440,483
RW 13,395,000
UT 610,000
CN 30,030,000 1,160,000 2,936,554
Total Amounts: 38,010,000 21,315,000 3,987,037
Butler 125.1500 KY-269 OPERATION OF REED'S FERRY AT LOGANSPORT FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032.(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 166,000 173,000
Project Cost: 0 166,000 173,000
Butler 8504.1000 KY-369 OPERATION OF THE ROCHESTER FERRY BY THE BUTLER AND OHIO PL
COUNTY FERRY AUTHORITY FOR FY 2027-2032.(12CCR) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 166,000 173,000
Project Cost: 0 166,000 173,000
Butler 10031 US-231 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BUTLER COUNTY ON (016B00002N) US-231 AT PL
W FK INDIAN CAMP CREEK DN FBP 850,925
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,672,835
Project Cost: 0 0 6,523,760

22 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Butler 10054 KY-340 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 340 OVER E PRONG PL
INDIAN CAMP CREE (016B00042N) DN FBP2 133,805
RW
UT
CN FBP2 892,032
Project Cost: 0 1,025,837 0
Butler 80329 CR-1401 Bridge replacement over Panther Creek PL
DN FBP2 142,168
RW
UT
CN FBP2 947,784
Project Cost: 0 0 1,089,952
Butler 80406 KY-79 Lane departure safety improvements on KY-79 between the KY-70 PL
crossroads and the Grayson County line DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 500,000
Butler 80412 KY-70 Widen KY-70 to provide turning lanes at KY 1468 (Gardiner Lane) and PL
new industrial access road. Extend Industrial Drive to KY 70 for new DN SPP 250,000
access to industrial park. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 0
Total for Butler county PL
DN 383,805 1,493,093
RW
UT
CN 1,224,032 6,966,619
Total Amounts: 0 1,607,837 8,459,712

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 23
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Caldwell 187.6000 US-641 RELOCATE US-641 FROM SOUTH OF THE LYON/CALDWELL COUNTY PL
LINE TO FREDONIA, 4.5 MILES. (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT STPF 2,080,000
CN STPF 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,080,000 5,000,000
Caldwell 10063 KY-293 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CALDWELL COUNTY ON (017B00050N) KY-293 PL
AT DONALDSON CREEK DN BRX 1,299,093
RW
UT
CN BRX 8,660,621
Project Cost: 9,959,714 0 0
Caldwell 22079 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 73.694 TO PL
MILEPOINT 77.994 DN NHPM 1,290,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 12,850,000
Project Cost: 0 0 14,140,000
Caldwell 80308 KY-91 EXTEND 3 LANE SECTION OF KY 91 (MARION ROAD) FROM MP 12.9 PL
TO BECKNER LANE (MP 13.4) (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 520,000 0 0
Total for Caldwell county PL
DN 1,819,093 1,290,000
RW
UT 2,080,000
CN 8,660,621 17,850,000
Total Amounts: 10,479,714 2,080,000 19,140,000

24 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Calloway 8502 KY-2594, CITY OF MURRAY BUSINESS LOOP FROM GLENDALE TO INDUSTRIAL PL
KY-94, ROAD. (SEE 1-120 FOR D, R, U FUNDING) (08CCN)(10CCR)(LET BY DN
PF-9999, CITY) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
US-641
UT
CN HGC 10,800,000
Project Cost: 10,800,000 0 0
Calloway 8952 CS-1047, IMPROVE N 16TH STREET FROM KY 1327 (5 POINTS) TO KY 121 PL
KY-748 (2020CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 5,750,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,750,000
Calloway 80411 KY-121 Widening of KY 121 from Lowes Drive to Country Club Lane, adding a PL
right-drop-lane and two-way-left-turn-lane to accommodate new DN STP1 750,000
entrance to Calloway County High School RW STP1 400,000
UT STP1 150,000
CN STP1 1,200,000
Project Cost: 750,000 550,000 1,200,000
Calloway 80412 KY-1550 Improve existing alignment to accommodate addition of right drop lane PL
and two-way left turn lane for new entrances to proposed Murray DN SPP 100,000
Elementary School. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Total for Calloway county PL
DN 850,000
RW 400,000
UT 150,000
CN 10,800,000 6,950,000
Total Amounts: 11,650,000 550,000 6,950,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 25
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Campbell 352.1000 PF-9999 Extend Pond Creek Road from US 27 to Persimmon Grove, KY 1121. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW CRP 13,200,000
UT CRP 1,620,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 13,200,000 1,620,000
Campbell 1086 KY-8 REPLACE 4TH STREET BRIDGE OVER THE LICKING RIVER BETWEEN PL
COVINGTON AND NEWPORT; BRIDGE NUMBER 059B00037N DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 27,042,195 35,520,000
FBP 29,770,000
Project Cost: 27,042,195 35,520,000 29,770,000
Campbell 8104 I -471, KY-8 CONSTRUCT NEW I-471 SOUTHBOUND OFF-RAMP AT KY-8 (SEE PL
ALSO 6-183.00). (02CCN)(06CCN) (2020CCN) DN NH 4,340,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,340,000 0
Total for Campbell county PL
DN 4,340,000
RW 13,200,000
UT 1,620,000
CN 27,042,195 35,520,000 29,770,000
Total Amounts: 27,042,195 53,060,000 31,390,000
Carlisle 80302 US-62 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS ON US-62 FROM PL
KY 1181 TO KY 408 TO ADDRESS ACCESS ISSUES, SAFETY DN NH 1,500,000
CONCERNS, FLOOD PRONE AREA, AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY. RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,500,000 0 0

26 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carlisle 80303 US-62 IMPROVE SAFETY, MOBILITY, CONNECTIVITY, AND ADDRESS PL
GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG US-62 BETWEEN HOBBS DN NH 1,000,000
ROAD/BOSWELL ROAD TO KY 307. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Carlisle 80323 US-51 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, TO IMPROVE PL
TRAFFIC FLOW, SAFETY AND ACCESS MANAGEMENT ISSUES FROM DN NH 1,000,000
KY 1377 TO TRUMAN CREEK BRIDGE IN BARDWELL. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 0 0
Total for Carlisle county PL
DN 2,500,000 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 2,500,000 1,000,000 0
Carroll 1084 US-42 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CARROLL COUNTY ON (021B00043N) US-42 AT PL
KENTUCKY RIVER & CITY ST DN
RW
UT BRX 2,500,000
CN BRX 28,645,178
Project Cost: 31,145,178 0 0
Carroll 20020 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 46.1205 TO PL
MILEPOINT 53.433 DN NHPM 2,840,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 28,400,000
Project Cost: 31,240,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 27
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carroll 22101 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 38.808 TO PL
MILEPOINT 46.1205 DN NHPM 3,170,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 31,670,000
Project Cost: 34,840,000 0 0
Total for Carroll county PL
DN 6,010,000
RW
UT 2,500,000
CN 88,715,178
Total Amounts: 97,225,178 0 0
Carter 3028 I -64 Carter County East Bound Rest Area Renovation located on I-64 at MP PL
174. (2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 940,000
Project Cost: 940,000 0 0
Carter 10081 CR-1464 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CARTER COUNTY ON (022C00044N) SMOKY PL
CREEK RD OVER SMOKEY CREEK DN FBP2 107,323
RW
UT
CN FBP2 715,484
Project Cost: 0 822,807 0
Carter 22051 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 148.665 TO PL
MILEPOINT 150.16 DN NHPM 430,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,310,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,740,000

28 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carter 22052 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 150.16 TO PL
MILEPOINT 154.26 DN NHPM 430,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,310,000
Project Cost: 0 4,740,000 0
Carter 80200 KY-1025 Geometric improvements on KY 1025 from US 60 (MP 0.0),East of PL
Olive Hill extending North 0.30 miles providing access to West Carter DN
Middle and High Schools and facilities. Project will include bike/ped RW
facilities. (2022CCN)
UT
CN CRP 2,470,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,470,000
Carter 80304 PF-9999 Improve connectivity in Grayson between KY 1 (Carol Malone Blvd) PL
and KY 3297 (Midland Trail). (2024CCN) DN SPP 810,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 810,000 0
Total for Carter county PL
DN 1,347,323 430,000
RW
UT
CN 940,000 5,025,484 6,780,000
Total Amounts: 940,000 6,372,807 7,210,000
Casey 164 PF-9999, IMPROVE SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG US 127 AT PL
US-127 DUNNVILLE (2022CCN) DN
RW NH 1,880,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,880,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 29
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Casey 8703 KY-70 RECONSTRUCT BELL HILL FROM MP 10.4 TO MP 11.9.(12CCN) PL
(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 3,420,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,420,000 0
Casey 8704 KY-49 RECONSTRUCT BRUSH CREEK HILL FROM MP 1.8 TO MP 2.8.(12CCN) PL
(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Casey 8706 KY-70 CONSTRUCT A NEW STORM DRAINING SYSTEM, CURB AND GUTTER PL
FROM BELDON AVENUE EASTWARD AND CONSTRUCT A NEW LEFT DN PROT 786,000
TURN ONTO COLLEGE STREET.(12CCN) RW PROT 1,660,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 786,000 1,660,000 0
Casey 10048 KY-910 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CASEY COUNTY ON (023B00084N) KY-910 AT PL
BRANCH- DRY FORK DN BRX 151,553
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,010,356
Project Cost: 0 0 1,161,909
Casey 80414 cr-1169 Surface Sloan Fork Road (CR 1169) from Turkey Creek Road to Merritt PL
Ridge Road, approximately 1.937 miles. (Memorandum of Agreement DN
with Casey County to construct) (MP 1.939 to 3.876) RW
UT
CN SPP 350,000
Project Cost: 350,000 0 0
Total for Casey county PL
DN 786,000 151,553
RW 7,960,000
UT
CN 350,000 1,010,356
Total Amounts: 1,136,000 7,960,000 1,161,909

30 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Christian 10 I -24 Improve capacity and mobility of the I-24/KY 115 interchange (Exit 89) PL
in Christian County, KY (2022BOP). (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 1,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,500,000 0 0
Christian 10.1000 KY-115 BRIDGE IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 115 BETWEEN MP 2.8 AND MP 3.0 AT PL
EXIT 89 OVER I-24 NEAR NEW BUC-EES DEVELOPMENT DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 6,250,000
Project Cost: 6,250,000 0 0
Christian 381.2000 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT NEW CONNECTOR FROM JUST SOUTH OF THE CSX PL
RAILROAD WEST OF PEMBROKE TO US 41 NEAR THE INDUSTRIAL DN
PARK. (D,R,U UNDER 2-381) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 13,500,000
Project Cost: 13,500,000 0 0
Christian 8953 KY-115 IMPROVE AND WIDEN KY 115 FROM ANDERSON ROAD (MP 6.87) TO PL
JUST SOUTH OF PEMBROKE (MP 9.625)(16CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 7,700,000
Project Cost: 0 7,700,000 0
Christian 8954 KY-115 IMPROVE AND WIDEN KY 115 FROM I-24 (MP 2.901) TO ANDERSON PL
ROAD (MP 687). (16CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 13,100,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,100,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 31
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Christian 10068 KY-107 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CHRISTIAN COUNTY ON (024B00041N) KY-107 PL
AT DONALDSON CREEK DN BRX 245,217
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,634,783
Project Cost: 0 0 1,880,000
Christian 10069 KY-109 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CHRISTIAN COUNTY ON (024B00058N) KY-109 PL
AT MCKNIGHTS CREEK DN BRX 237,593
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,583,953
Project Cost: 0 0 1,821,546
Christian 22014 I -24 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-024 NON-CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 75 TO MILEPOINT 85.563 DN NHPM 310,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 310,000
Total for Christian county PL
DN 792,810
RW 1,500,000
UT
CN 19,750,000 7,700,000 16,318,736
Total Amounts: 21,250,000 7,700,000 17,111,546
Clark 8401 KY-1958 NEW CONSTRUCTION TO EXTEND VETERANS MEMORIAL PARKWAY PL
FROM IRVINE RD (KY89) TO BOONEWBORO RD (KY 627) DN
RW NH 9,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 9,000,000 0

32 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clark 22154 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT 5.341 DN NHPM 460,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,626,186
Project Cost: 0 5,086,186 0
Clark 80359 CR-1205 Bridge Rehab/Replacement on Four Mile Road (CR 1205) at MP PL
2.15-2.16 over an Unnamed Tributary approx. 2.16 miles east along DN FBP2 158,545
the KY River from the town of Ford (025C00028N) RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,056,965
Project Cost: 0 0 1,215,510
Total for Clark county PL
DN 460,000 158,545
RW 9,000,000
UT
CN 4,626,186 1,056,965
Total Amounts: 0 14,086,186 1,215,510
Clay 8003.1000 US-421 IMPROVE US 421 FROM GOOSE CREEK BRIDGE (MP 15.4) TO CHOP PL
BOTTOM RD (MP 14.3) INCLUDING RECONSTRUCTION OF DN
HIGHWAY/RAIL GRADE CROSSING ON KY-1999 AT THE RW
INTERSECTION WITH US-421 AND KY-80 (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN CRP 14,000,000
Project Cost: 0 14,000,000 0
Clay 8864 CR-1286 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ALONG URBAN CREEK ROAD (CR 1286) AND, PL
INCLUDING INTERSECTIONS AT HAL ROGERS PARKWAY AND KY DN
687. (14CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 12,950,000
Project Cost: 12,950,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 33
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clay 10176 US-421 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026B00012N) US-421 AT PL
RICE BRANCH DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 717,551
Project Cost: 0 0 737,551
Clay 10178 KY-66 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026B00050N) KY-66 AT PL
JACKS CREEK DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 1,074,388
Project Cost: 0 0 1,094,388
Clay 10185 CR-1155 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026C00072N) CR-1155 AT PL
MILL CREEK DN
RW FBP2 5,000
UT FBP2 10,000
CN FBP2 410,400
Project Cost: 0 425,400 0
Clay 10186 CR-1150 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026C00125N) CR-1150 AT PL
RED BIRD DN
RW
UT
CN FBP2 630,000
Project Cost: 0 630,000 0
Clay 80251 US-421 CONSTRUCT NEW CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN US 421 AT MP 17.51 PL
TO RAILROAD AVE. AT MP 0.1. THIS WILL REQUIRE APPROXIMATELY DN SPP 400,000
300' OF NEW ROADWAY ALONG THE CONNECTOR, A 450' 3-LANE RW SPP 410,000
BRIDGE, NEW RIGHT TURN LANE ON US 421 AND NEW TRAFFIC
UT SPP 390,000
SIGNALS AT PROPOSED INTERSECTION. THIS IS CONTINGENT ON
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 800,000

34 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clay 80352 HR-9006 Preliminary Engineering and Environmental for Hal Rogers Parkway PL
Improvement (HRPI) corridor from London to Hazard (BMP 3.887 to DN IF 24,960,000
EMP 55.201) (IF-Potential RAISE GRANT) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 24,960,000 0
Clay 80356 KY-1524 Install Guardrail on KY 1524 in Clay County (MP 9.45-12.3) (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Clay 80423 CR-1082 Martin Cemetery Rd Bridge over Red Bird River Replacement PL
026C00158N DN FBP2 100,000
RW
UT FBP2 100,000
CN FBP2 630,000
Project Cost: 0 830,000 0
Clay 80425 CR-1156 Powder Horn Rd Bridge Replacement 026C00029N PL
DN FBP2 75,000
RW FBP2 10,000
UT
CN FBP2 400,000
Project Cost: 0 485,000 0
Total for Clay county PL
DN 25,535,000
RW 15,000 430,000
UT 110,000 410,000
CN 13,040,000 16,070,400 1,791,939
Total Amounts: 13,040,000 41,730,400 2,631,939

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 35
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clinton 8600 US-127 RELOCATION OF US 127 FROM KY 90 INTERSECTION TO AARON PL
RIDGE ROAD (MP 11.7 TO MP 16.315) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 5,800,000
UT NH 3,510,000
CN
Project Cost: 5,800,000 0 3,510,000
Clinton 8601.3000 US-127 RELOCATION OF US-127 FROM EAST OF THE AARON RIDGE RD AND PL
OLD US-127 INTERSECTION, EXTENDING NORTHERLY TO NORTH OF DN
THE KY-3063 AND OLD US-127 INTERSECTION. (SEE 8-108 AND RW
8-115 FOR PE&ENV)(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 19,150,000
Project Cost: 0 0 19,150,000
Total for Clinton county PL
DN
RW 5,800,000
UT 3,510,000
CN 19,150,000
Total Amounts: 5,800,000 0 22,660,000
Crittenden 326.1700 KY-91 OPERATION OF CAVE-IN-ROCK FERRY AT OHIO RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032 USING AUDITED COSTS AS THE BASIS.(12CCR) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR). This is Kentucky's share of the RW
annual costs, total cost shared with Illinois.
UT
CN SPP 831,000 831,000
Project Cost: 0 831,000 831,000
Crittenden 80201 KY-295 Reconstruct and elevate a 0.12 mile section of KY 295 above the PL
floodplain from M.P. 1.038 to M.P. 1.605 just south of Dycusburg DN
(2022CCN) RW SPP 180,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 300,000 0

36 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Crittenden 80400 US-60 Improve safety, truck mobility, and access at the Intersection of US-60 PL
and US-641/E Gum St. DN STP2 300,000
RW STP2 300,000
UT STP2 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 300,000 450,000 0
Crittenden 80401 US-60 Improve safety and substandard geometrics in curves along US-60 PL
near Rosebud Church Road DN STP2 250,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Total for Crittenden county PL
DN 550,000
RW 480,000
UT 270,000
CN 831,000 831,000
Total Amounts: 550,000 1,581,000 831,000
Cumberland 20021 KY-61 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-61 FROM MILEPOINT 12.9 TO MILEPOINT PL
13.6 DN STP5 272,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 3,128,000
Project Cost: 0 3,400,000 0
Total for Cumberland county PL
DN 272,000
RW
UT
CN 3,128,000
Total Amounts: 0 3,400,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 37
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Daviess 229 KY-298 RECONSTRUCT INTERSECTION AT FAIRVIEW DRIVE (KY 3143) AND PL
KY 298. (12CCR) (16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 3,050,000
Project Cost: 3,050,000 0 0
Daviess 8300.3000 KY-54 IMPROVE KY-54 FROM KY 1456 (THRUSTON-DERMONT RD) TO PL
COUNTRYSIDE DRIVE; DESIGN UNDER PARENT 2-8300.00. (2018BOP) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN NH 5,030,000
Project Cost: 0 5,030,000 0
Daviess 8300.4000 KY-54 IMPROVE KY-54 FROM COUNTRYSIDE DRIVE TO JACK HINTON RD. PL
DESIGN UNDER PARENT 2-8300.00. (2018BOP) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 5,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,750,000 0
Daviess 8801 KY-1456 ADDRESS SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND SAFETY PL
CONCERNS ON KY 1456 FROM KY 54 TO HAYDEN ROAD. MP 2.778 DN
TO 4.714 (SEE 2-8709.00)(14CCN)(16CCR) (2022CCN) RW STP1 4,400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,400,000 0
Daviess 8854 KY-3143 IMPROVE KY-3143 FROM KY-3335 TO KY 54. (14CCN) (2020CCR) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 11,300,000
Project Cost: 0 11,300,000 0

38 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Daviess 10020 KY-2262 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES WITH GLOVER CARY BRIDGE OVER OHIO PL
RIVER. JOINT PROJECT WITH INDIANA. (030B00118N)(BSBP) DN BRX 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 11,500,000
Daviess 80301 KY-298 OLD HARTFORD RD - WIDEN TO IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW AND PL
SAFETY. PROJECT BEGINS AT HARRIET LN (CR 1120H) AND ENDS DN STP1 1,290,000
AT BURLEW BLVD (KY 1432). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,290,000 0
Daviess 80302 KY-2699 RECONSTRUCT GOETZ DR FROM SOUTHTOWN BLVD (KY 2121) TO PL
FREDERICA ST (US 431). INSTALL TURN LANES AS NEEDED. DN SPP 490,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 600,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 490,000 600,000 0
Daviess 80410 US-60 Add dual left turn lanes from KY 331 westbound onto US 60 PL
eastbound (BMP 0.108 to EMP 0.0) as well as dual receiving lanes on DN NH 400,000
US 60 eastbound. (BMP 10.287 to EMP 10.179) RW
UT NH 300,000
CN NH 1,700,000
Project Cost: 0 400,000 2,000,000
Daviess 80411 CS-1100 Construct an additional southbound lane on Carter Road (CS 1100) PL
from McFarland Avenue to Parrish Avenue. DN SPP 600,000
RW SPP 800,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 850,000
Project Cost: 0 600,000 2,150,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 39
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Daviess 80414 I-165 Construct new exchange on I-165 between MP 59.5 and 68.5. PL
DN STPF 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 0
Daviess 80415 AU-9005 Upgrade Audubon Parkway to interstate standards for conversion to PL
I-169. DN NH 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 0 0
Total for Daviess county PL
DN 1,490,000 4,290,000 1,500,000
RW 10,750,000 800,000
UT 800,000
CN 3,050,000 16,330,000 12,550,000
Total Amounts: 4,540,000 31,370,000 15,650,000
Edmonson 7030.1000 KY-259, RECONSTRUCT KY-70/KY-259 FROM 0.36 MILE NORTH GREEN RIVER PL
KY-70 BRIDGE AT BROWNSVILLE TO 0.42 MILE NORTH OF THE DN
KY-70/KY-259 INTERSECTION.(06CCR)(2004BOPC)(12CCR)(14CCR) RW
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN STP2 1,240,000
Project Cost: 0 1,240,000 0
Edmonson 80317 KY-259 RECONSTRUCTION AND REALIGNMENT OF KY 259 FROM MP 12.096 PL
TO 15.633/ (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0

40 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Edmonson 80409 CR-1308 Minor widening of Blackgold Road to provide secondary access to PL
new Kyrock school DN SPP 300,000
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 600,000
CN SPP 500,000
Project Cost: 0 550,000 1,100,000
Total for Edmonson county PL
DN 1,600,000
RW 250,000
UT 600,000
CN 1,240,000 500,000
Total Amounts: 0 3,090,000 1,100,000
Elliott 192.0100 KY-32 IMPROVE KY-32 FROM WEST OF STEGALL COLD SPRING ROAD TO PL
KY-7 NEAR NEWFOUNDLAND. (PRIORITY SECTION I)(06CCR) (08CCR) DN
(10CCR)(12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 20,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 20,000,000
Elliott 8802 KY-32 KY-32 FROM 9.2 MILE MARKER TO 10.2 MILE MARKER WIDENING. PL
(14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCN)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 7,930,000
Project Cost: 7,930,000 0 0
Total for Elliott county PL
DN
RW
UT
CN 7,930,000 20,000,000
Total Amounts: 7,930,000 0 20,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 41
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Estill 4315 KY-499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-499 IN ESTILL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Estill 80300 KY-52 Construct a walkway across the Kentucky River along KY 52 in Irvine. PL
(2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,310,000
Project Cost: 2,310,000 0 0
Total for Estill county PL
DN
RW
UT
CN 2,330,000
Total Amounts: 2,330,000 0 0
Fayette 122.2000 US-25 Lexington-Georgetown; Reconstruct/Widen US 25 from Spurr Road to PL
Kearney Road. (Section 1) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Fayette 122.3000 US-25 Lexington-Georgetown; Reconstruct/Widen US 25 from Kearney Road PL
to Ironworks Road. (Section 2) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 36,225,000
Project Cost: 0 36,225,000 0

42 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 227.1400 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL-AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR LEXINGTON PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY 2026 DN
THROUGH FY 2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT RW
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000
Project Cost: 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000
Fayette 265 CO-0 CONSTRUCT CITATION BOULEVARD FROM RUSSELL CAVE ROAD TO PL
NEWTOWN PIKE. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 4,060,000
Project Cost: 0 4,060,000 0
Fayette 357.1700 KY-169, OPERATION OF VALLEY VIEW FERRY AT KY RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
PF-9999 THROUGH FY 2032. (12CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 540,000 540,000
Project Cost: 0 540,000 540,000
Fayette 412 US-27 REPLACE RJ CORMAN RAILROAD BRIDGE OVERPASS (MP 8.378) PL
IMPROVE DRAINAGE AND TYPICAL SECTION ON US 27 (NORTH DN
BROADWAY) (12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCN)(2020CCR)(2022CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,000,000
Fayette 412.1000 US-27 REPLACE RJ CORMAN RAILROAD BRIDGE OVERPASS (MP 8.378), PL
IMPROVE DRAINAGE AND TYPICAL SECTION ON US 27 (NORTH DN
BROADWAY)(12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW
(2022CCR)(FEDERAL RAISE GRANT FUNDING COMPONENT)(SEE ITEM
UT
NO. 7-412.00 FOR NH COMPONENT)
CN KYD 8,120,000
Project Cost: 8,120,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 43
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 438.1000 KY-4 Reduce congestion on KY 4 from Trade Center to Railroad Bridge PL
North of Palumbo Drive DN
RW NH 6,820,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,820,000 0
Fayette 439 KY-4 NEW CIRCLE RD: IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
FROM US-68 (HARRODSBURG RD) TO US-60 (VERSAILLES RD). SEE DN NH 2,480,000
SEGMENTS 2A & 2B IN AUGUST, 1998 ADVANCE PLANNING STUDY. RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,480,000
Fayette 462 KY-4 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS TO NEW CIRCLE ROAD BETWEEN PL
BOARDWALK AND BRYAN STATION ROAD. - STATE FUNDED DN
COMPONENT OF FEDERAL GRANT RECEIVED IN LATE 2023. RW
(2024CCR)
UT KYD 690,000
CN HGC 3,980,000
Project Cost: 0 690,000 3,980,000
Fayette 475 CS-4702 Improve the Red Mile Corridor between South Broadway and PL
Versailles Road. DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 13,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,500,000
Fayette 8902 KY-1927 IMPROVE LIBERTY ROAD FROM GRAFTONS MILL LANE TO NEW PL
CIRCLE ROAD AND IMPROVE INTERSECTION WITH NEW CIRCLE DN
ROAD. (16CCN)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 6,600,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,600,000

44 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 8909.1000 I -75 REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-64/I-75 FROM NORTHERN SPLIT TO PL
NEWTOWN PIKE (MP 115.200 – 117.665). SECTION 1 (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT NH 30,000
CN NH 7,500,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 7,500,000
Fayette 8909.1500 I -75 REPLACE EXISTING I-75 SOUTHBOUND BRIDGE (034B00085N) AND PL
APPROACHES TO REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-64/I-75 FROM DN
NORTHERN SPLIT TO NEWTOWN PIKE (MP 118.0 TO MP 116.8). RW
SECTION 1 PRIORITY CONSTRUCTION SECTION.
UT
CN NH 15,000,000
Project Cost: 0 15,000,000 0
Fayette 10076 I -75 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON S 75 NC OVER N PL
BROADWAY & N LIMESTONE (034B00083L and 034B00083R) DN BRX 548,856
RW
UT
CN BRX 3,659,040
Project Cost: 0 0 4,207,896
Fayette 20050 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 71 (74.3 CARDINAL) PL
TO MILEPOINT 74.729 DN STP5 180,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,801,000
Project Cost: 0 1,981,000 0
Fayette 80150 US-60 ADDRESS CONGESTION AND IMPROVE SAFETY ON US 60 FROM PL
MILEPOINT 12.41 TO MILEPOINT 16.37 BY WIDENING AND DN
MODERNIZING US 60 FROM THE END OF THE FOUR-LANE SECTION RW STPF 1,610,000
NEAR POLO CLUB BLVD TO KY 859 (HALEY RD). (2020CCN)
UT STPF 1,530,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 1,610,000 1,530,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 45
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 80206 CO-0 Address congestion and improve safety on US 60 (Winchester Rd) PL
and Man O' War Blvd (KY 1425 & CS 4524) creating an alternative DN SPP 2,515,000
route between Sir Barton Way (CS 2636) and Polo Club Blvd (CS RW
2548) (2022CCN). (State to provide design funding only, city to provide
UT
right of way, utilities, and construction through a Transportation
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,515,000 0
Fayette 80306 US-60 Modernize roadway, improve multi-mobility, and include safety and PL
capacity improvements at intersections on US 60 (Versailles Road) DN
from Viley Road to west end of Norfolk Southern railroad bridge. RW NH 2,210,000
Breakout Section of US 60 from Viley Road to Oxford Circle
UT NH 820,000
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,210,000 820,000
Total for Fayette county PL
DN 2,695,000 3,028,856
RW 1,610,000 9,030,000
UT 30,000 2,220,000 820,000
CN 15,920,000 65,426,000 54,579,040
Total Amounts: 17,560,000 79,371,000 58,427,896
Fleming 8915 KY-801 WIDEN KY 801 FROM NEAR MMRC REGIONAL PARK TO KY 158 IN PL
FLEMING CO. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Fleming 10083 KY-597 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FLEMING COUNTY ON (035B00004N) KY-597 AT PL
INDIAN CREEK DN BRZ 140,251
RW
UT
CN BRZ 935,008
Project Cost: 0 1,075,259 0

46 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Fleming county PL
DN 140,251
RW
UT
CN 6,935,008
Total Amounts: 0 7,075,259 0
Floyd 195.1000 KY-979 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 979, BEGINNING 0.14 MI WEST OF PL
NEWMAN’S BRANCH ROAD TO THE JOHN M. STUMBO SCHOOL. DN
(SECTION 1) RW
UT
CN HGC 6,140,000
Project Cost: 6,140,000 0 0
Floyd 195.2000 KY-979 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 979 FROM BRANHAM’S CREEK TO 0.14 PL
MIL WEST OF NEWSOME BRANCH ROAD. (SECTION 2) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 7,080,000
Project Cost: 7,080,000 0 0
Floyd 4336 KY-1929 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1929 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Floyd 4355 KY-404 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-404 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 130,000
Project Cost: 130,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 47
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4356 KY-404 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-404 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Floyd 4387 KY-3385 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3385 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Floyd 4390 KY-680 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-680 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Floyd 4423 KY-1100 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1100 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Floyd 4424 KY-1100 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1100 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0

48 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4425 KY-1428 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1428 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Floyd 4426 KY-1428 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1428 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 9,000
Project Cost: 9,000 0 0
Floyd 4429 KY-3384 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3384 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 6,000
Project Cost: 6,000 0 0
Floyd 4430 KY-550 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-550 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 88,000
Project Cost: 88,000 0 0
Floyd 4431 KY-777 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-777 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 99,000
Project Cost: 99,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 49
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4432 KY-850 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-850 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 49,000
Project Cost: 49,000 0 0
Floyd 4472 KY-1498 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1498 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Floyd 10098 CR-1655 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FLOYD COUNTY ON (036C00074N) MARTHA'S PL
VINEYARD AT BULL CREEK DN
RW BRZ 35,000
UT BRZ 300,000
CN
Project Cost: 335,000 0 0
Total for Floyd county PL
DN
RW 35,000
UT 300,000
CN 14,061,000
Total Amounts: 14,396,000 0 0
Franklin 10045 KY-676 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FRANKLIN COUNTY ON (037B00074N) KY 676 PL
(E-W CONN) AT KENTUCKY RIVER & KY 1263 DN
RW FBP 70,000
UT FBP 90,000
CN FBP 18,000,000
Project Cost: 0 160,000 18,000,000

50 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Franklin 10139 US-60 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF "SINGING" BRIDGE ON US 60X OVER PL
KENTUCKY RIVER (037B00065N) DN
RW STP1 1,050,000
UT STP1 3,120,000
CN STP1 8,000,000
Project Cost: 1,050,000 3,120,000 8,000,000
Franklin 22032 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 57.811 TO PL
MILEPOINT 59.431 DN NHPM 970,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 9,700,000
Project Cost: 0 10,670,000 0
Franklin 80301 US-60 IMPROVE SAFETY AND TRAFFIC FLOW ON US 60 (VERSAILLES PL
ROAD) FROM US 460 TO I-64 IN FRANKFORT. (2024CCN) DN NH 730,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 0
Total for Franklin county PL
DN 1,700,000
RW 1,050,000 70,000
UT 3,210,000
CN 9,700,000 26,000,000
Total Amounts: 1,050,000 14,680,000 26,000,000
Fulton 25 JC-9003 IMPROVE THE PURCHASE PARKWAY AT THE KENTUCKY/TENNESSEE PL
LINE TO SOUTHWEST OF THE US-51 INTERCHANGE.(I-69 CORRIDOR DN
IMPROVEMENT) (2022CCR) RW
UT NH 1,120,000
CN NH 6,000,000
Project Cost: 1,120,000 6,000,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 51
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fulton 320.1700 KY-1354 OPERATION OF HICKMAN FERRY AT MISSISSIPPI RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 144,000 144,000
Project Cost: 0 144,000 144,000
Fulton 80310 KY-125 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY AND PL
FREIGHT ACCESS ISSUES FROM KY 166 TO KY 1099 IN HICKMAN. DN SPP 1,560,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,560,000 0 0
Fulton 80319 KY-94 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES PL
AND FREIGHT ACCESS AT INTERSECTION WITH KY 94 SOUTHWEST. DN SPP 300,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 300,000 0
Fulton 80324 KY-1099 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD INTERSECTION GEOMETRICS AND PL
ADDRESS ACCESS ISSUES AT KY 309 & KY 1099 IN HICKMAN TO DN SPP 750,000
IMPROVE THE LESS THAN ADEQUATE TRUCK TURNING RADIUS. RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 750,000 0 0
Fulton 80417 CR-1312 Widening and resurfacing of Mengel Exn. road from intersection with PL
KY 1354 and extending west 0.300 miles (Memorandum of Agreement DN SPP 20,000
with Fulton County to Construct) RW
UT
CN SPP 150,000
Project Cost: 0 170,000 0
Total for Fulton county PL
DN 2,310,000 320,000
RW
UT 1,120,000
CN 6,294,000 144,000
Total Amounts: 3,430,000 6,614,000 144,000

52 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Gallatin 8910 I -71 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ON I-71 FROM US-127 TO MP 64. (16CCN) PL
(18CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 10,000,000 0
Gallatin 22104 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 56.673 TO PL
MILEPOINT 59.94 DN STP4 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 4,820,000
Project Cost: 5,300,000 0 0
Gallatin 80402 I-71 Reconstruct I-71 from the end of the 6-lane typical section to Little PL
Sugar Road Overpass DN NH 4,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 4,000,000 0 0
Total for Gallatin county PL
DN 4,480,000
RW
UT
CN 4,820,000 10,000,000
Total Amounts: 9,300,000 10,000,000 0
Garrard 196.3000 US-27 IMPROVE US-27 FROM WEST LANCASTER BYPASS TO KY-34. PL
(2006BOPC) (16CCN)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 9,350,000
UT NH 5,520,000
CN
Project Cost: 9,350,000 5,520,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 53
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Garrard 196.5000 CO-0 West Lancaster Bypass from North of Lancaster to Bell Street at PL
Stanford, KY. (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 12,740,000
UT NH 1,300,000
CN
Project Cost: 12,740,000 1,300,000 0
Garrard 80326 KY-34 Safety improvements to address right turn movements out of Chenault PL
Bridge onto Lexington Road (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT CRP 50,000
CN CRP 325,000
Project Cost: 0 0 375,000
Garrard 80409 KY-52 Improve safety on KY 52 from Boone Creek Road to KY 1150 in PL
Garrard County DN SPP 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,500,000 0 0
Garrard 80410 KY-52 Improve safety on KY 52 from KY 590 in Boyle County to Martin Lane PL
in Garrard County. DN SPP 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Total for Garrard county PL
DN 3,500,000
RW 22,090,000
UT 6,820,000 50,000
CN 325,000
Total Amounts: 25,590,000 6,820,000 375,000

54 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Grant 80216.1000US-25 Update US 25 from KY 2842 to south intersection of KY 491. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 1,470,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,470,000 0
Total for Grant county PL
DN
RW 1,470,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 1,470,000 0
Graves 220 CO-0 Rebuild Downtown Mayfield, KY from 2021 Tornado Devastation PL
(Allocated KYD USDOT RAISE Grant Funding project) (See Zvarious DN
99-8600 SPP Western KY December 2021 Tornado Relief Funding Pool RW
for uncovered FEMA or Insurance for reconstruction of existing
UT KYD 4,300,000
roads.)
CN KYD 27,200,000
Project Cost: 4,300,000 27,200,000 0
Graves 10260 KY-2422 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 2422 OVER BR OF OBION PL
CREEK (042B00232N) DN BRZ 221,285
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,475,232
Project Cost: 0 1,696,517 0
Graves 80103 KY-303 WIDEN KY 303 FROM MP 16.034 (EAST FARTHING ST) TO MP 16.807 PL
(CHARLES DR) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT SPP 2,700,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,700,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 55
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Graves 80202 KY-121 Upgrade/Widen KY 121 bypass in Mayfield to four lanes. (2022CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN SPP 600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 600,000 0 0
Total for Graves county PL
DN 600,000 221,285
RW
UT 4,300,000 2,700,000
CN 28,675,232
Total Amounts: 4,900,000 31,596,517 0
Grayson 8502.2000 US-62 IMPROVE US 62 FROM JUST EAST OF BEEHIVE CURVE TO KY224. PL
CONSTRUCTION SEGMENT 2. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 9,720,000
Project Cost: 0 0 9,720,000
Grayson 10048 KY-79 BRIDGE PROJECT IN GRAYSON COUNTY ON (043B00053N) KY-79 AT PL
ROUGH RIVER LAKE DN FBP 310,073
RW
UT
CN FBP 2,067,154
Project Cost: 2,377,227 0 0
Grayson 22167 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 106.08 TO MILEPOINT 108 DN NHPM 360,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,640,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000

56 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Grayson 80311 KY-3155 IMPROVE INTERSECTIONS ALONG THE LEITCHFIELD BYPASS AT KY PL
1214, US 62, AND KY 920. (2024CCN) DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Grayson 80406 US-62 Replace bridge 043B00036N on US 62 over Caney Creek to achieve PL
widening DN FBP2 250,000
RW FBP2 20,000
UT FBP2 120,000
CN FBP2 2,400,000
Project Cost: 250,000 140,000 2,400,000
Total for Grayson county PL
DN 560,073 500,000 360,000
RW 20,000
UT 120,000
CN 2,067,154 15,760,000
Total Amounts: 2,627,227 640,000 16,120,000
Green 398.1000 KY-3535 Construction of new connector on the east side of Greensburg PL
beginning at KY 3535 and extending to Taylor Cox Road (Design under DN
4-398) RW STPF 4,000,000
UT STPF 3,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 3,000,000
Green 4316 KY-61 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-61 IN GREEN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 57
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Green 8712 KY-61 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY-61 FROM PITMAN CREEK PL
BRIDGE TO JUST NORTH OF KY323. (12CCN)(14CCR)(16CCR) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 8,640,000
Project Cost: 8,640,000 0 0
Green 80154.2000KY-210 ADDRESS SAFETY ON KY 210 FROM MORNINGSTAR ROAD (LARUE PL
MP14.23) TO JUST EAST OF CORINTH CHURCH (TAYLOR MP0.60) DN
(2024CCN) RW STPF 3,150,000
UT STPF 3,240,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,150,000 3,240,000
Green 80358 KY-61 Improve safety by reconstruction and widening bridge ID 044B00008N PL
on KY 61 over Clover Lick Creek at MP 6.03, approximately 2.2 miles DN FBP 148,265
south of intersection with US 68. RW
UT
CN FBP 988,437
Project Cost: 0 0 1,136,702
Total for Green county PL
DN 148,265
RW 7,150,000
UT 6,240,000
CN 8,730,000 988,437
Total Amounts: 8,730,000 7,150,000 7,376,702
Greenup 8509.1000 KY-207 Improve KY 207 from the intersection with KY 67 (MP 11) to MP 15 PL
(Design under 9-8509) DN
RW STPF 8,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 8,000,000 0

58 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Greenup 10109 KY-8 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 8S OVER OHIO RV,CSX PL
RR,CO Rd, (045B00064N) DN BRX 528,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 5,280,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,808,000
Total for Greenup county PL
DN 528,000
RW 8,000,000
UT
CN 5,280,000
Total Amounts: 0 8,000,000 5,808,000
Hancock 197 KY-69, IMPROVE CONNECTION BETWEEN US-60 AND CANNELTON BRIDGE PL
PF-9999 APPROACH AT HAWESVILLE. DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 7,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,500,000
Hancock 10147 KY-69 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 69 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(046B00043N) DN FBP 125,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 750,000
Project Cost: 0 875,000 0
Hancock 80306 US-60 WIDEN US-60 FROM MILE 2.2 IN LEWISPORT TO KY-1957. (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW NH 250,000
UT NH 1,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 1,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 59
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hancock 80407 KY-69 Address safety and condition concerns of KY-69 near Tick Ridge Rd. PL
DN SPP 300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 300,000
Total for Hancock county PL
DN 125,000 300,000
RW 250,000
UT 1,000,000
CN 750,000 7,500,000
Total Amounts: 0 1,125,000 8,800,000
Hardin 154.3000 US-31 ADDRESS CONGESTION, SAFETY, AND MOBILITY ALONG US 31W PL
FROM VETERANS WAY IN ELIZABETHTOWN TO THE NORTH WILSON DN NH 2,500,000
ROAD OVERPASS IN RADCLIFF. (2018BOP) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,500,000 0 0
Hardin 198 PF-9999 EXTEND RING ROAD FROM THE WESTERN KENTUCKY PARKWAY TO PL
I-65. (REQUIRES RELOCATION OF I-65 SOUTHBOUND COMMERCIAL DN
VEHICLE MONITORING STATION, PROJECT 4-286.10) (12CCR)(14CCR) RW STP2 6,100,000
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,100,000
Hardin 201 US-31 Removal of two at-grade CSX Railroad Crossings on Quarry Road PL
(CS-1518) near US31W, and the construction of a single separated DN
grade crossing, in the City of Upton in Hardin County. (2024CCR) RW RRS 790,000
UT RRS 710,000
CN RRS 5,300,000
Project Cost: 790,000 710,000 5,300,000

60 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hardin 202 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT A BYPASS OF GLENDALE. (2022BOP) (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW STP2 6,400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,400,000 0
Hardin 204 CO-0 College Street Road and US 62 Safety Improvements Project with PL
USDOT SS4A Grant and $800,000 state matching funds. DN
RW
UT
CN KYD 7,000,000
SPP 800,000
Project Cost: 7,800,000 0 0
Hardin 286.1000 I -65 I-65 SOUTHBOUND PORT OF ENTRY FOR A COMMERCIAL VEHICLE PL
MONITORING STATION. (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 7,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,500,000
Hardin 10054 KY-86 BRIDGE PROJECT IN HARDIN COUNTY ON (047B00060N) KY-86 AT PL
VERTRESS CREEK DN BRX 270,484
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,803,229
Project Cost: 0 0 2,073,713
Hardin 80303 PF-9999 EXTEND COMMERCE DRIVE FROM SPRINGFIELD ROAD TO US 31W AT PL
KY 1136 ON THE SOUTH SIDE OF ELIZABETHTOWN. (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 2,890,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,890,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 61
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hardin 80351 CR-1292 Replace Meeting Creek Bridge (047C00063N) over P&L Railway ( MP PL
4.050 -4.070). DN FBP 182,201
RW
UT
CN FBP 1,214,676
Project Cost: 0 1,396,877 0
Total for Hardin county PL
DN 2,500,000 182,201 270,484
RW 790,000 9,290,000 6,100,000
UT 710,000
CN 7,800,000 1,214,676 14,603,229
Total Amounts: 11,090,000 11,396,877 20,973,713
Harlan 4370 KY-987 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-987 IN HARLAN COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Harlan 4371 KY-987 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-987 IN HARLAN COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Harlan 10015 KY-2007 BRIDGE PROJECT IN HARLAN COUNTY ON (048B00179N) KY-2007 PL
AT WALLINS CREEK DN BRX 144,955
RW
UT
CN BRX 966,368
Project Cost: 1,111,323 0 0

62 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harlan 10018 CS-1041 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KENTUCKY AV OVER PL
MARTINS FK CUMBERLAND RV (048C00067N) DN BRZ 1,019,992
RW
UT
CN BRZ 6,799,950
Project Cost: 7,819,942 0 0
Harlan 10233 KY-38 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 38 OVER Fanny Wynn PL
Branch (048B00197N) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 776,000
Project Cost: 0 776,000 0
Harlan 80259 US-421 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS TO IMPROVE GEOMETRICS AT PARTICULAR PL
LOCATIONS OF US 421 CROSSING OVER PINE MOUNTAIN BETWEEN DN
US 119 AND KY 221 IN HARLAN COUNTY TO ADDRESS SAFETY RW SPP 750,000
CONCERNS. MILEPOINT 17.2 TO MILEPOINT 23.0 (2022CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 750,000 0 0
Harlan 80363 US-119 Construct various turn lanes along US 119 at the following highways - PL
Camp O. Cumberlands, Billy G Hollow Road, KY 3467, Shewmaker DN
Hollow, KY 3452 ad Tremont Lane (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SAF 1,040,000
Project Cost: 1,040,000 0 0
Harlan 80401 US-421 Reconstruct remaining unimproved section of US421 from the end of PL
the progressive design-build project to Barn Branch DN STP2 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Total for Harlan county PL
DN 3,164,947
RW 750,000
UT
CN 8,926,318 776,000
Total Amounts: 12,841,265 776,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 63
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harrison 4307 KY-32 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-32 IN HARRISON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Harrison 80251 CR-1124, CONSTRUCT A CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN OLD LAIR ROAD AND PL
KY-982, KY 982 (NEW LAIR ROAD) NEAR THE HARRISON COUNTY HIGH DN
PF-9999, SCHOOL. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,580,000
US-27
UT SPP 200,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,780,000 0
Harrison 80252 CS-1159 CONSTRUCT A ROUNDABOUT AT THE INTERSECTION OF WEBSTER PL
AVENUE (CS-1071) AND EDUCATION DRIVE. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 630,000 0
Harrison 80353 KY-982 Provide a two way left turn lane on KY 982 (New Lair Road) (MP 4.4 - PL
5.1) (2024CCN) DN SPP 780,000
RW SPP 600,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 780,000 600,000 0
Total for Harrison county PL
DN 780,000
RW 2,710,000
UT 300,000
CN 50,000
Total Amounts: 830,000 3,010,000 0

64 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hart 80407 US-31 Improve the intersections and access management along US 31W at PL
KY 88 and KY 571 near the Hart County High School DN STP2 650,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 650,000 0 0
Total for Hart county PL
DN 650,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 650,000 0 0
Henderson 383.1000 CS-1372 Improve the intersection of Watson Lane (CS-1372) and US 41. PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 4,300,000
Project Cost: 4,300,000 0 0
Henderson 383.2000 CS-1372 Address safety and congestion along Watson Lane (CR-1372). PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 3,030,000
Project Cost: 0 3,030,000 0
Henderson 1088.5000 PF-9999 DELIVERY OF I-69 ORX SECTION 2 FROM US 60 NORTH TO SECTION PL
3 SOUTH OF EVANSVILLE. (COSTS SHARED BY KY AND IN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT NH 10,000,000
CN NH 39,000,000
Project Cost: 10,000,000 39,000,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 65
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Henderson 1088.5200 PF-9999 I-69 Ohio River Crossing (ORX) at Henderson/Evansville (KY Share) - PL
SGF Fund Component "CONTINGENT UPON AWARD OF A FEDERAL DN
GRANT OR APPROVED FEDERAL LOAN FOR THE PROJECT"". RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN SGF 150,000,000
Project Cost: 150,000,000 0 0
Henderson 1088.5300 PF-9999 I-69 OHIO RIVER CROSSING (ORX) AT HENDERSON/EVANSVILLE PL
SECTION 2 TOLLING COMPONENT. (KY SHARE) DN
RW
UT
CN IF 175,000,000
Project Cost: 0 175,000,000 0
Henderson 22333 KY-425 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-425 FROM MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT PL
4.747 DN STP3 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 5,520,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Henderson 80413 PF-9999 Construct a new connector between US-41 and US-60 in Henderson PL
between MM 11.9 and 12.1 on US-41 N and MM 12.3 and 12.4 on US DN STPF 2,150,000
60 E. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,150,000 0
Total for Henderson county PL
DN 2,630,000
RW
UT 10,000,000
CN 154,300,000 222,550,000
Total Amounts: 164,300,000 225,180,000 0

66 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Henry 552 I -71 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-71 FROM KY-53 PL
TO KY-153. DN NH 6,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,500,000 0
Henry 8820 KY-55 REHABILITATION-OVERLAY AND WIDENING EXISTING KY-55 FROM PL
KY-22 TO CURVE AT MP 2.210 NORTH OF EMINENCE. INCLUDES DN
REPLACING EXISTING CURB AND GUTTER AND SIDEWALKS, AND RW SPP 1,830,000
RELOCATION OF IMPACT UTILITIES. (MP 1.408 TO 2.210)(14CCN)
UT
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,830,000 0
Total for Henry county PL
DN 6,500,000
RW 1,830,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 8,330,000 0
Hickman 80203 US-51 Correct geometric deficiencies and improve safety, access, and PL
regional connectivity from Clayton Street to KY-703 in Clinton. DN
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW STP2 1,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Total for Hickman county PL
DN
RW 1,500,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 1,500,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 67
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hopkins 804.3000 PF-9999 Extend Midtown Blvd from CSX Railroad to Whittington Drive, 500’ PL
south of Commerce Drive. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 6,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,500,000
Hopkins 20031 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 124.946 TO PL
MILEPOINT 126.839 DN NHPM 1,100,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 11,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 12,100,000
Hopkins 22083 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 89.848 TO PL
MILEPOINT 93.724 DN NHPM 470,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,715,274
Project Cost: 0 0 5,185,274
Hopkins 22087 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 108.994 TO PL
MILEPOINT 114.246 (113.81 NON-CARDINAL) DN NHPM 1,050,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 10,517,430
Project Cost: 11,567,430 0 0
Hopkins 22337 US-62 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-62 FROM MILEPOINT 15.4 TO MILEPOINT PL
15.8 DN STP3 100,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 1,150,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0

68 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hopkins 80300 KY-260 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY OF KY 260 FROM THE PL
APPROACHES AT THE RAILROAD CROSSING IN HANSON TO THE DN SPP 730,000
SOUTHBOUND ON AND OFF RAMPS OF I69. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 0
Total for Hopkins county PL
DN 1,050,000 830,000 1,570,000
RW
UT
CN 10,517,430 1,150,000 22,215,274
Total Amounts: 11,567,430 1,980,000 23,785,274
Jackson 4404 KY-89 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-89 IN JACKSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Jackson 10041 KY-89 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JACKSON COUNTY ON (055B00028N) KY-89 AT PL
HORSE LICK CREEK DN
RW BRZ 2,000
UT BRZ 5,000
CN BRZ 1,056,128
Project Cost: 7,000 0 1,056,128
Jackson 10198 US-421 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JACKSON COUNTY ON (055B00001N) US-421 PL
AT INDIAN CREEK DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 1,540,000
Project Cost: 1,540,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 69
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jackson 80104 US-421 ADDRESS SUBSTANDARD HORIZONTAL AND VERTICAL ALIGNMENT PL
OF US 421 IN THE CLOVER BOTTOM AREA NEAR THE STONE DN
QUARRY. (2020CCN) RW SPP 1,395,500
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,395,500 400,000
Jackson 80105 US-421 ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES WITH VERTICAL AND HORIZONTAL PL
ALIGNMENT ON US 421 FROM MP 11.6 EAST OF PILGRIMS REST RD DN
TO MP 12.6 (2020CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 13,000,000
Project Cost: 13,000,000 0 0
Jackson 80261 KY-578 MOVE KY 578 OVER 10FT FOR IMPROVED SIGHT DISTANCE AND PL
CREATE A BETTER APPROACH FOR MOORE CREEK GREEN HILL DN
ROAD (2022CCN) RW SPP 60,000
UT SPP 340,000
CN SPP 1,400,000
Project Cost: 0 60,000 1,740,000
Total for Jackson county PL
DN
RW 2,000 1,455,500
UT 5,000 740,000
CN 14,580,000 2,456,128
Total Amounts: 14,587,000 1,455,500 3,196,128
Jefferson 344.0100 KY-1747 WIDEN SOUTHBOUND HURSTBOURNE LANE TO 3 LANES FROM LINN PL
STATION RD (CS-1004H) TO EDEN AVE (CS-1660H). (06CCR) DN SPP 230,000
(03KYD)(2006BOPP)(SEE 5-344.02 FOR KYD C PHASE)(14CCR) RW SPP 100,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 230,000 100,000 0

70 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 554 I -265 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-265 FROM I-65 TO PL
US-31E. (2024CCR) DN NH 3,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,000,000 0
Jefferson 557 I -71 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-71 FROM I-264 TO PL
I-265. (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 390,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 390,000
Jefferson 587 PF-9999 Reconnecting West Louisville to the Ohio Riverfront throughout the PL
Riverside Expressway (I-64) Corridor USDOT Grant project (Louisville DN KYD 1,927,000
Metro to provide $100,000 toward the cost of project). RW
UT KYD 1,575,000
CN KYD 24,839,000
STPF 1,387,000
Project Cost: 29,728,000 0 0
Jefferson 607 I -264, I -64 INSTALLATION OF SOLAR LIGHTING AT I-64/I-264 INTERCHANGE AT PL
SHERMAN MINTON BRIDGE; I-264/RIVER PARK-ALI; I-264/BELLS DN
LANE; I-264/VIRGINA/DUMESNIL; AND I-264/RALPH AVE-CANE RUNE RW
INTERSECTIONS IN JEFFERSON COUNTY KENTUCKY. (2024BOP)
UT
CN CARB 2,080,000
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 0
Jefferson 965.1900 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR LOUISVILLE PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY DN
2026-2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT PENDING RW
MPO TIP). (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000
Project Cost: 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 71
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 1070 CS-1017 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON E KENTUCKY ST (CS 1017G) PL
OVER SOUTH FORK BEARGRASS CREEK 0.01 MILE E OF SCHILLER DN FBP2 356,881
AVE (CS 1138G) 056C00083N (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,379,206
Project Cost: 0 2,736,087 0
Jefferson 1079 CR-1001 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056C00130N) RIVER PL
RD AT GOOSE CREEK DN BRZ 1,210,368
RW
UT
CN BRZ 8,069,119
Project Cost: 0 0 9,279,487
Jefferson 8810 KY-1931 THREE LANE WIDENING ALONG KY-1931 FROM THE DOSS HIGH PL
SCHOOL ENTRANCE TO PALATKA ROAD, INCLUDING INTERSECTION DN
IMPROVEMENTS WITH PALATKA ROAD AND TURN LANES. (14CCN) RW
(2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN HGC 6,070,000
Project Cost: 6,070,000 0 0
Jefferson 8908 KY-155 WIDEN TAYLORSVILLE ROAD FROM I-265 TO KY-148. (18CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 23,760,000
Project Cost: 0 23,760,000 0
Jefferson 8953 KY-1747 IMPROVE THE HURSTBOURNE PARKWAY (KY 1747) AT PL
SHELBYVILLE ROAD (US 60) INTERSECTION TO INCREASE DN SPP 350,000
CAPACITY, REDUCE DELAYS, AND IMPROVE SAFETY. (16CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 350,000 0 0

72 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 8954.1000 KY-155 Improve safety and traffic operations on KY 155 from MP 2.0 in PL
Spencer County to Floyds Fork In Jefferson County (total length 6.247 DN STPF 2,080,000
miles) (Portion of 5-8954.0). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,080,000 0
Jefferson 10008 CS-1079 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF OLD WESTPORT RD BRIDGE OVER PL
GOOSE CREEK. (056C00113N) (2020CCR) DN BRX 165,331
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,102,206
Project Cost: 0 0 1,267,537
Jefferson 10016 I -64 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00142N) I-64 AT PL
KY 3077 (RIVER RD). (BRIDGE PAINTING OF I-64 RIVERSIDE DN
EXPRESSWAY BRIDGES) RW
UT
CN BRX 8,000,000
Project Cost: 8,000,000 0 0
Jefferson 10064 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00179N) I-65 AT PL
HILL, CSX RR & BURNETT (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 43,000,000
FBP 6,304,783
Project Cost: 49,304,783 0 0
Jefferson 10065 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00180N) I-65 AT PL
US 60A (EASTERN PKWY) DN BRO 5,340,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 5,340,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 73
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10066 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00183N) I-65 AT PL
E KENTUCKY & S BROOK ST (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 47,000,000
BRX 7,000,000
FBP 17,971,591
Project Cost: 0 0 71,971,591
Jefferson 10068 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00191N) I-65 AT PL
JACOB, BROADWAY, GRAY ST DN FBP 10,612,000
RW
UT
CN BRO 52,616,706 52,616,706
Project Cost: 0 63,228,706 52,616,706
Jefferson 10069 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00192N) I-65 AT PL
E CHESTNUT ST DN BRO 819,705
RW
UT
CN BRO 5,464,700
Project Cost: 0 6,284,405 0
Jefferson 10075 I -264 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00250N) I-264 AT PL
P&L RAILWAY DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 35,367,503
Project Cost: 35,367,503 0 0
Jefferson 10099 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00193N) I-65 AT PL
BROOK/MUHAMMAD ALI. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 10,545,062
RW FBP 50,000 50,000
UT FBP 75,000 75,000
CN FBP 70,300,410 6,500,000
Project Cost: 0 80,970,472 6,625,000

74 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10100 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00194N) I-65 AT PL
MUHAMMAD ALI SB ON-RAMP. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY DN FBP 154,954
PROJECT) RW
UT
CN FBP 1,033,024
Project Cost: 0 0 1,187,978
Jefferson 10101 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00195R) I-65 NB PL
AT FLOYD STREET. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN BRX 611,386
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,075,906
Project Cost: 0 4,687,292 0
Jefferson 10102 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00197R) I-65 NB PL
AT E. LIBERTY STREET. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN BRX 1,408,057
RW
UT
CN BRX 9,387,049
Project Cost: 0 10,795,106 0
Jefferson 10104 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00182N) I-65 AT PL
BRANDIES AVE. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 2,330,669
RW FBP 50,000
UT FBP 75,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,455,669
Jefferson 10105 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00181N) I-65 AT PL
UNIVERSITY BLVD. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 2,624,670
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,624,670

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 75
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10106 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00212N) I-65 AT PL
BRADLEY AVE. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP2 14,287,927
Project Cost: 14,287,927 0 0
Jefferson 10115 US-31 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 31 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(056B00136N) DN FBP 1,050,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 7,000,000
Project Cost: 8,050,000 0 0
Jefferson 20016 I -264 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-264 FROM MILEPOINT 12.7 TO MILEPOINT PL
18.41 DN NHPM 2,730,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 27,270,000
Project Cost: 30,000,000 0 0
Jefferson 20024 KY-913 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-913 FROM MILEPOINT 2.38 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.07 DN STP5 60,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 690,000
Project Cost: 0 0 750,000
Jefferson 20025 KY-1020 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1020 FROM MILEPOINT 2.67 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.66 DN STP5 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 920,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000

76 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 20027 KY-1932 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1932 FROM MILEPOINT 3.21 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.8 DN STP5 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 920,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000
Jefferson 20029 KY-1934 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1934 FROM MILEPOINT 4.44 TO PL
MILEPOINT 9.74 DN STP3 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 5,520,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,000,000
Jefferson 20069 I -265 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-265 FROM MILEPOINT 18.8 TO MILEPOINT PL
23.364 DN NHPM 770,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,680,738
Project Cost: 8,450,738 0 0
Jefferson 22024 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 13.124 (13.206 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 19.44 DN NHPM 1,820,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 18,180,000
Project Cost: 0 0 20,000,000
Jefferson 22069 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 123.18 TO PL
MILEPOINT 127.57 DN NHPM 3,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,600,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 77
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 22070 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 131.24 TO PL
MILEPOINT 136.338 DN NHPM 1,400,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 14,000,000
Project Cost: 15,400,000 0 0
Jefferson 80000 KY-1531 EASTWOOD FISHERSVILLE CONNECTOR TO I-64 PL
DN NH 5,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 0
Jefferson 80001 US-60 IMPROVE OPERATIONS ALONG US-60 FROM OLD SHELBYVILLE PL
ROAD TO NORTH ENGLISH STATION ROAD. (18CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW NH 650,000
UT NH 700,000
CN
Project Cost: 650,000 700,000 0
Jefferson 80003 PF-9999 EXTEND PLANTSIDE DRIVE FROM REHL ROAD TO TAYLORSVILLE PL
ROAD. (18CCN)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR). To be completed DN
through an MOA with the city of Louisville. RW
UT
CN CRP 13,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,000,000
Jefferson 80200 KY-2050 Reduce congestion, improve safety, and enhance mobility on KY 2050 PL
(Herr Lane) from Prince Valiant Drive/Westmar Terrace to Bedford DN
Lane. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 580,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 580,000 0

78 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80250 CR-1006 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF A REALIGNED OLD BARDSTOWN PL
ROAD TO ALIGN WITH THE ENTRANCE TO WALGREENS AT HILLOCK. DN
(MILEPOINT 0.0 TO MILEPOINT 0.01) WITH A MEMORANDUM OF RW
AGREEMENT WITH THE LOUISVILLE METRO GOVERNMENT.
UT
(2022CCN)
CN SPP 440,000
Project Cost: 440,000 0 0
Jefferson 80258 KY-1819 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY, AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL
ON KY 1819 (WATTERSON TRAIL) FROM BLUEGRASS PARKWAY TO DN
BLANKENBAKER PARKWAY (KY 913) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 1,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 530,000 1,600,000
Jefferson 80259 US-31 RIGHT SIZING AND PEDESTRIAN ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS ON US 31E PL
FROM MILEPOINT 14.625 TO MILEPOINT 13.125 (2022CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 2,240,000
Project Cost: 2,240,000 0 0
Jefferson 80261.1000US-31 Add dedicated eastbound left and right turn lanes from Thixton Lane PL
(KY 2053) onto Bardstown Rd (US 31E) (MP 1.946) DN STPF 150,000
RW STPF 50,000
UT STPF 50,000
CN STPF 2,000,000
Project Cost: 150,000 2,100,000 0
Jefferson 80261.2000US-31 Provide offset left turns on Bardstown Rd (US 31E) at Hillock Drive/ PL
Colonel Hancock Drive Intersection (MP 4.089) DN STPF 150,000
RW STPF 50,000
UT STPF 50,000
CN STPF 2,000,000
Project Cost: 150,000 2,100,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 79
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80261.3000US-31 Add dedicated turn lanes from Cedar Creek Rd to Bardstown Rd (US PL
31E). (2nd EB left turn and EB right turn lanes) (MP 4.369) DN STPF 150,000
RW STPF 50,000
UT STPF 50,000
CN
Project Cost: 150,000 100,000 0
Jefferson 80302 US-31 TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENTS ON US PL
31W FROM KY 841 TO KY 44 IN SOUTHERN JEFFERSON COUNTY; TO DN NH 3,710,000
INCLUDE THE CONSIDERATION OF ACCESS MANAGEMENT AND RW
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,710,000 0
Jefferson 80330 KY-3222 SAFETY ANALYSIS OF THE KY 3222 (ROSE ISLAND ROAD) PL SPP 220,000
BEGINNING IN JEFFERSON COUNTY MILE POINT 0.0-1.0 AND OLDHAM DN
COUNTY FROM 0.0 TO 3.1 (INTERSECTION OF KY 1793). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 220,000 0
Jefferson 80342 US-42 ROADWAY RECONFIGURATION, ONE-WAY TO TWO-WAY PL
CONVERSION. (2024CCN) (POSSIBLE SLO FUNDING) DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Jefferson 80404 KY-155 Improve Traffic Operations and Safety on KY 155 from the Floyds Fork PL
Bridge (MP 4.000) to KY 148 (MP 4.400). DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 500,000

80 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80406 US-42 Operational improvements along US 42 from Falls Creek Road (MP 7.5) PL
to Woodstone Way (MP 7.9) DN NH 470,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 470,000 0 0
Jefferson 80432 I-65 Reconfigure I-65 SB ramps to Arthur Street to improve safety and to PL
improve ingress/egress to/from the University of Louisville campus DN NH 120,000
and adjoining neighborhoods. (MP 133.3 - 133.8) RW NH 15,000
UT NH 55,000
CN
Project Cost: 135,000 55,000 0
Jefferson 80433 KY-913 Planning study to extend Blankenbaker Parkway to the Gene Snyder PL SPP 1,200,000
DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,200,000 0 0
Total for Jefferson county PL 1,200,000 220,000
DN 9,497,000 38,643,091 18,445,992
RW 665,000 1,410,000 490,000
UT 1,575,000 980,000 1,750,000
CN 226,766,951 198,783,977 207,322,646
Total Amounts: 239,703,951 240,037,068 228,008,638
Jessamine 87.3500 KY-169, COMPLETE EAST NICHOLASVILLE BYPASS WITH AT GRADE PL
PF-9999, INTERSECTION AT US 27. DN
US-27 RW
UT
CN NH 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 10,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 81
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jessamine 414 KY-1980 IMPROVE ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, TYPICAL SECTION, AND PL
ROADWAY HAZARDS ON KY 1980 (BRANNON RD) FROM US 68 DN
(HARRODSBURG RD) TO US 27 (NICHOLASVILLE RD)(12CCR) RW
(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN HGC 28,600,000
Project Cost: 0 28,600,000 0
Jessamine 80108 KY-169 IMPROVE KY-169 FROM NORTH OF CLEAR CREEK RD IN JESSAMINE PL
COUNTY TO NORTH OF KY-1967 IN WOODFORD COUNTY. DN
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,640,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,640,000 0
Jessamine 80418 US-68 IMPROVE THE SAFETY ON US 68 IN MERCER AND JESSAMINE PL
COUNTIES NEAR THE KY RIVER. (MP 14.45 IN MERCER COUNTY TO DN STP2 8,000,000
MP 1.38 IN JESSAMINE COUNTY RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 8,000,000 0 0
Jessamine 80428 PF-9999 Scoping study to explore feasible and cost effective highway projects PL SPP 250,000
connecting Nicholasville and I-75 in Madison Co. DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 0
Total for Jessamine county PL 250,000
DN 8,000,000
RW 5,640,000
UT
CN 28,600,000 10,000,000
Total Amounts: 8,000,000 34,490,000 10,000,000

82 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Johnson 4391 KY-1092 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1092 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Johnson 4392 KY-201 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-201 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Johnson 4393 KY-40 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-40 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Johnson 4394 KY-580 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-580 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Johnson 4433 KY-3387 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3387 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 83
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Johnson 80101 US-460 IMPROVE US 460 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH KY 114 TO THE PL
INTERCHANGE WITH US 23 (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 1,240,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,240,000 0 0
Johnson 80250 KY-40, CONSTRUCT ACCESS ROAD TO PROPOSED JOHNSON COUNTY HIGH PL
PF-9999 SCHOOL AND MIDDLE SCHOOL CAMPUS. TO INTERSECT WITH KY 40 DN
AT MILEPOINT 8.85 (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 8,700,000
Project Cost: 8,700,000 0 0
Total for Johnson county PL
DN
RW 1,240,000
UT
CN 9,214,000
Total Amounts: 10,454,000 0 0
Kenton 17.3100 CO-0 CONSTRUCT A COMPANION BRIDGE TO THE EXISTING I-71/75 BRENT PL
SPENCE BRIDGE OVER THE OHIO RIVER BETWEEN COVINGTON, KY DN
AND CINCINNATI, OH. (DEDICATED ADDITIONAL STATE GENERAL RW
FUNDS) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SGF 125,000,000
Project Cost: 0 125,000,000 0
Kenton 449 KY-17 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON KY-17 AT THE PL
I-275 INTERCHANGE. (18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW STPF 530,000
UT STPF 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 530,000 2,080,000 0

84 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 450.1000 KY-1303 Reduce Congestion along KY 1303 from Dudley Road to I-275. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW STPF 4,400,000
UT STPF 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 4,400,000 2,160,000 0
Kenton 8951 US-25 IMPROVE EXISTING ALIGNMENT WITH BUTTERMILK PIKE, PL
ORPHANAGE ROAD, AND US 25. FT. MITCHELL WILL PAY $50,000 DN
TOWARD DESIGN. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) RW STPF 5,000,000
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 0
Kenton 10044 KY-17 BRIDGE PROJECT IN KENTON COUNTY ON (059B00048N) KY 17 AT PL
OHIO RIVER DN FBP 1,920,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 12,000,000
Project Cost: 13,920,000 0 0
Kenton 22130 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 NON-CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 184.708 TO MILEPOINT 186.95 DN NHPM 1,600,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 8,400,000
Project Cost: 0 0 10,000,000
Kenton 80002 KY-236 RECONSTRUCT KY 236 (STEVENSON ROAD) FROM ALICE STREET PL
TO JACQUELINE DRIVE.(18CCN) (2020CCR) Kenton Co. government DN
will allocate $250,000 to sanitary sewer and waterline relocation. The RW SPP 8,500,000
City of Erlanger up to $350,000. The City of Erlanger is es eligible to
UT
apply to SD1 for up to 50% of the total cost of storm water
CN
Project Cost: 0 8,500,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 85
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 80203.1000KY-536 Reconstruct KY 536 from KY 16 to Staffordsburg Road. (2024BOP) PL
DN
RW STP2 9,200,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 9,200,000 0 0
Kenton 80254 US-25 REHABILITATE/RECONSTRUCT US 25 FROM BUTTERMILK PIKE PL
(KY371) TO I-75 (MP 8.58 TO MP 9.86) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 880,000
UT SPP 2,800,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 880,000 2,800,000
Kenton 80400 I-75 Construct new DCD interchange on I-75 in Kenton County at Buttermilk PL
Pike (KY 371) DN NH 5,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 0
Total for Kenton county PL
DN 1,920,000 5,000,000 1,600,000
RW 14,130,000 14,380,000
UT 4,240,000 2,800,000
CN 12,000,000 125,000,000 8,400,000
Total Amounts: 28,050,000 148,620,000 12,800,000
Knott 158 KY-80 Eliminate rockfall hazards from KY 2029 to Rock Fork Road. PL
DN
RW PROT 250,000
UT PROT 710,000
CN
Project Cost: 960,000 0 0

86 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4323 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Knott 4324 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Knott 4357 KY-160 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-160 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Knott 4375 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Knott 4376 KY-3391 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3391 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 87
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4377 KY-550 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-550 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Knott 4378 KY-582 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-582 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Knott 4395 KY-2102 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2102 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 200,000
Project Cost: 200,000 0 0
Knott 4396 KY-2102 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2102 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 140,000
Project Cost: 140,000 0 0
Knott 4397 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0

88 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4398 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Knott 4434 KY-3391 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3391 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 52,000
Project Cost: 52,000 0 0
Knott 4435 KY-582 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-582 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 22,000
Project Cost: 22,000 0 0
Knott 8200 KY-1231 NEW CONSTRUCTION OF ONE MILE STRETCH OF KY-1231 BEGINNING PL
AT BRIDGE AFTER LEAVING KY-550. (04CCN)(06CCR)(08CCR) DN
(10CCR)(12CCR) (2020CCN) RW
UT
CN CRP 5,320,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,320,000
Knott 80302 KY-899 Improve roadway geometrics along KY 899 from end of prior PL
construction near Pippa Passes to the bottom of the hill at Short DN SPP 590,000
Branch. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 590,000 0
Total for Knott county PL
DN 590,000
RW 250,000
UT 710,000
CN 1,084,000 5,320,000
Total Amounts: 2,044,000 590,000 5,320,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 89
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knox 4373 KY-11 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-11 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Knox 4379 KY-3438 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3438 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Knox 4405 KY-11 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-11 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 29,000
Project Cost: 29,000 0 0
Knox 8857 KY-3439 IMPROVE SAFETY OF INTERSECTION AT US 25E AND KY 3439 AND PL
PROVIDE SIDEWALKS TO AN AREA FREQUENTED BY PEDESTRIANS DN
(MP 0.0 - MP 0.9) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 2,920,000
Project Cost: 0 2,920,000 0
Knox 10205 CR-1532 BRIDGE PROJECT IN KNOX COUNTY ON (061C00073N) CR-1532 AT PL
STINKING CREEK DN
RW FBP2 10,000
UT FBP2 10,000
CN FBP2 894,355
Project Cost: 0 0 914,355

90 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knox 80155 KY-1487 IMPROVE SAFETY, ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND PL
PROVIDE FLOOD MITIGATION ON KY 1487 (MANCHESTER STREET) DN
FROM JUDGE STREET TO US 25E (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN CRP 7,800,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,800,000
Knox 80203 KY-11 Improve safety and access along KY 11 by raising roadway above PL
Flood X elevation. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW PROT 210,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 210,000 0 0
Knox 80413 Improve safety by constructing new access road to aquatic center PL
owned by Barbourville Independent Schools that will be transferred to DN SPP 150,000
Barbourville City local government to provide safe ingress and egress RW
to facility
UT SPP 75,000
CN SPP 750,000
Project Cost: 150,000 75,000 750,000
Total for Knox county PL
DN 150,000
RW 210,000 10,000
UT 75,000 10,000
CN 79,000 2,920,000 9,444,355
Total Amounts: 439,000 2,995,000 9,464,355
Larue 8909 KY-84 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 84 PL
FROM KY 357 TO KY 61 (LINCOLN PARKWAY) NEAR HODGENVILLE DN SPP 840,000
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 840,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 91
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Larue 80154.1000KY-210 ADDRESS SAFETY ON KY 210 FROM KY 1618 (6.994) TO PL
MORNINGSTAR ROAD (MP14.230) IN LARUE COUNTY. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,680,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,680,000 0
Total for Larue county PL
DN 2,520,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 2,520,000 0
Laurel 147 US-25 REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-25 FROM KY-1006 TO KY-2069; PL
IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM US-25 NEAR KY-2069 TO KY-229; DN
IMPROVE KY-229 FROM THE NEW CONNECTOR NORTH TO KY-192; RW
AND IMPROVE ACCESS TO THE SCHOOL FROM KY-192 BYPASS.
UT
(06CCR)(10CCR)(12CCR)(14CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN CRP 30,400,000
HGC 35,815,000
Project Cost: 0 66,215,000 0
Laurel 169 CO-0 Improve Rudy Bear Road and KY 3007 from KY 80 South to KY 3432 PL
West of I-75. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 250,000
RW SPP 2,500,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 2,500,000 1,500,000
Laurel 179 I -75 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-75 NB TRUCK REST HAVEN. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0

92 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 180 I -75 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-75 SB TRUCK REST HAVEN. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Laurel 4380 KY-2041 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2041 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Laurel 4381 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Laurel 4382 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Laurel 4383 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 93
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 4407 KY-363 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-363 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 142,000
Project Cost: 142,000 0 0
Laurel 8515 US-25 IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY BETWEEN CORBIN AND LONDON FROM PL
KY-1006 TO US-25E. (08CCN) (2024CCR) DN STP1 2,000,000
RW STP1 2,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Laurel 8909 HR-9006 IMPROVE THE HAL ROGERS PARKWAY TO INTERSTATE PL
STANDARDS FROM 4.0 MI EAST OF KY 192 TO LAUREL/CLAY CO. DN NH 1,170,000
LINE. (I-75 TO HAZARD) (16CCN)(18CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,170,000
Laurel 10042 KY-490 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LAUREL COUNTY ON (063B00004N) KY-490 AT PL
ROCKCASTLE RIVER DN BRZ 482,051
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,213,675
Project Cost: 0 3,695,726 0
Laurel 80154 HR-9006 ADDRESS ACCESS AND SAFETY ISSUES AT THE INTERSECTION OF PL
KY 80 AND PAYNE TRAIL AND BUSH ELEMENTARY SCHOOL BY DN SPP 120,000
CONSTRUCTING A CONNECTOR ROAD FROM HAL ROGERS RW
PARKWAY (HR 9006) TO KY 6264 (PAYNE TRAIL). (2020CCN)
UT
(2022CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 120,000 0

94 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 80312 KY-638 Improve the geometrics of a curve, widen a drainage structure, and PL
provide turn lanes to Johnson Elementary School on KY 638 DN SPP 210,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 210,000 0 0
Laurel 80357 KY-192 Widen KY 192 from Mallard Drive to Esquire Lane, address horizontal PL
and vertical alignment as needed (MP 16.61 - 18.08) (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0
Laurel 80402 KY-1535 Reconstruct curve and address geometric deficiencies and safety on PL
KY-1535 DN SPP 350,000
RW SPP 1,000,000
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 1,350,000 400,000 0
Laurel 80409 US-25 Widen US25 to a three-lane typical section with a center two-way PL STP1 250,000
left-turn lane. Access management with sidewalk. Concept A from the DN
11-181 planning study RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Laurel 80426 KY-363 Reconstruct and address geometric deficiencies and safety on KY PL
363 (Whitley Street) from KY 2391 to Meyers Baker Road. DN SPP 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 0 0
Total for Laurel county PL 250,000
DN 1,810,000 3,902,051 1,170,000
RW 1,000,000 2,500,000 2,000,000
UT 400,000 1,500,000
CN 2,542,000 69,428,675
Total Amounts: 5,602,000 76,230,726 4,670,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 95
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lawrence 156 KY-32 Improve KY-32 from Elliott C/L to Yatesville Lake reconstruction PL
section for better access to Yatesville Lake and to improve safety. DN SPP 1,760,000
See Elliott County listing for continuation of project to KY-7 @ Sandy RW
Hook. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,760,000 0 0
Lawrence 4399 KY-644 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-644 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Lawrence 4400 KY-644 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-644 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Lawrence 4436 KY-1690 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1690 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 74,000
Project Cost: 74,000 0 0
Lawrence 10016 KY-644 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LAWRENCE COUNTY ON (064B00038N) KY-644 PL
AT LEVISA FORK DN BRX 683,372
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,555,811
Project Cost: 0 0 5,239,183

96 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lawrence 22352 KY-201 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-201 FROM MILEPOINT 5 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.9 DN NHPM 80,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 640,000
Project Cost: 0 0 720,000
Lawrence 80400 KY-2565 Improve intersection traffic movements along KY 2565 and KY 32 PL
between US 23 and Louisa DN SPP 425,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 425,000 0
Total for Lawrence county PL
DN 1,760,000 425,000 763,372
RW
UT
CN 254,000 5,195,811
Total Amounts: 2,014,000 425,000 5,959,183
Lee 5017 KY-52 Rockfall Mitigation on KY 52 near Beattyville from MP 12.8 to MP 13.4 in PL
Lee County. (To seek future federal Protect funds) DN
RW PROT 870,000
UT PROT 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 990,000 0 0
Lee 10051 CS-1005 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LEE COUNTY ON (065C00024N) SILVER CREEK PL
RD AT SILVER CREEK DN BRX 70,910
RW
UT
CN BRX 472,731
Project Cost: 0 0 543,641

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 97
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lee 80351 KY-11 Reconstruct KY 11 from 0.5 miles south of KY 587 to 0.65 miles north PL
of KY 52 in Beattyville (MP 1.082 - 4.798) (2024CCN) DN STPF 2,700,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,700,000
Total for Lee county PL
DN 2,770,910
RW 870,000
UT 120,000
CN 472,731
Total Amounts: 990,000 0 3,243,641
Leslie 4320 US-421 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-421 IN LESLIE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Leslie 4408 US-421 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-421 IN LESLIE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 99,000
Project Cost: 99,000 0 0
Leslie 10254 KY-1780 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY-1780 OVER MID-FK KY PL
RVR (066B00026N) DN BRZ 205,820
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,372,134
Project Cost: 0 0 1,577,954

98 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Leslie 80002 KY-3424 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 3424 FROM MP 1.1 TO MP 1.5. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 1,360,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,360,000
Leslie 80003 KY-2009 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 2009 FROM MP 13.418 TO MP PL
14.767.(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 560,000
Project Cost: 0 560,000 0
Leslie 80004 KY-1482 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 1482 FROM MP 0 TO MP 1.9. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 0 120,000 0
Leslie 80005 KY-257 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 257 FROM MP 5.723 TO MP 5.853. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 0 40,000 0
Leslie 80006 KY-1807 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 1807 FROM MP 0.914 TO MP 1.256. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 0 60,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 99
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Leslie 80108 KY-1482 GUARD RAIL INSTALLATION ON BULL SKIN RD MP 1.582 TO MP 2 PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Leslie 80109 KY-1807 GUARD RAIL INSTALLATION ON WOOTEN RD FROM MP 0.089 TO MP PL
3.567 AS NEEDED (2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 180,000
Project Cost: 180,000 0 0
Leslie 80305 KY-257 PROVIDE ADDITIONAL ACCESS TO RESIDENTS ALONG KY257 PL
DURING FLOODING EVENTS (2024CCN) (Study Underway) MP 6.7 - DN STPF 1,000,000
11 RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Leslie 80412 CR-1449 Widen, resurface, and extend asphalt on CR-1449 (Leeco Road) in PL
preparation for development of an RV park, pavilion, baseball/softball DN SPP 250,000
fields, housing development, and trails along the route RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Total for Leslie county PL
DN 250,000 1,000,000 205,820
RW
UT
CN 389,000 780,000 2,732,134
Total Amounts: 639,000 1,780,000 2,937,954

100 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 199.1500 US-119 IMPROVE US-119 FROM KY-2034/COUGAR DRIVE TO BRASS DRIVE PL
(MP 16.731 TO 17.740). THROUGH MAYKING (MP 19.925 TO 20.6) DN
AND AUXILIARY LANE (MP 22.0 TO 22.75) (16CCN)(SEE 12-199.10 RW
FOR D, R, U) (18CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 10,000,000
Project Cost: 10,000,000 0 0
Letcher 311.8000 PF-9999, RECONSTRUCTION OF US-119 FROM 0.15 MILE WEST OF KY-806 TO PL
US-119 KY-932. 2012BOP (2024CCN) DN
RW APD 3,420,000
UT APD 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,820,000 0
Letcher 311.9000 US-119 Improve safety along US 119 from bottom (North side) of Pine Mountain PL
to intersection with KY 15 at Whitesburg (MP 14.1-15.8) (2024CCN) DN APD 1,560,000
RW APD 1,500,000
UT APD 2,000,000
CN APD 15,000,000
Project Cost: 1,560,000 3,500,000 15,000,000
Letcher 4327 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4344 KY-588 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-588 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 101
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4345 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Letcher 4358 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Letcher 4359 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Letcher 4360 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 170,000
Project Cost: 170,000 0 0
Letcher 4361 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0

102 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4362 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Letcher 4380 KY-588 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-588 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Letcher 4402 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4403 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4404 KY-932 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-932 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 103
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4437 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 107,000
Project Cost: 107,000 0 0
Letcher 4438 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 88,000
Project Cost: 88,000 0 0
Letcher 4439 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 57,000
Project Cost: 57,000 0 0
Letcher 4440 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 94,000
Project Cost: 94,000 0 0
Letcher 4441 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 67,000
Project Cost: 67,000 0 0

104 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4442 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 53,000
Project Cost: 53,000 0 0
Letcher 4443 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 59,000
Project Cost: 59,000 0 0
Letcher 4444 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 66,000
Project Cost: 66,000 0 0
Letcher 4445 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 41,000
Project Cost: 41,000 0 0
Letcher 4446 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 75,000
Project Cost: 75,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 105
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4447 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 54,000
Project Cost: 54,000 0 0
Letcher 4448 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 25,000
Project Cost: 25,000 0 0
Letcher 8702 KY-805 IMPROVE THE EXISTING ROADWAY TO MEET CURRENT STANDARDS PL
AND IMPROVE CONGESTION INTO AND OUT OF JENKINS BETWEEN DN
MP 9.176 AND MP 9.247. RW
UT
CN STP2 1,250,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Letcher 10119 KY-931 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LETCHER COUNTY ON (067B00053N) KY-931 AT PL
N FORK KENTUCKY RIVER DN
RW FBP2 75,000
UT FBP2 250,000
CN FBP2 1,777,613
Project Cost: 0 2,102,613 0
Letcher 10122 KY-2036 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LETCHER COUNTY ON (067B00094N) KY-2036 PL
AT ROCKHOUSE CREEK DN
RW BRX 54,000
UT BRX 164,000
CN BRX 1,574,580
Project Cost: 0 0 1,792,580

106 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 80115 KY-463 INSTALL A GUARD RAIL ON KY 463 NEAR GORDON PARK PL
(2020CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 11,000
Project Cost: 11,000 0 0
Total for Letcher county PL
DN 1,560,000
RW 4,995,000 54,000
UT 2,650,000 164,000
CN 11,847,000 3,027,613 16,574,580
Total Amounts: 13,407,000 10,672,613 16,792,580
Lewis 8807 KY-57 RECONSTRUCT KY-57 FROM KY-9 TO FLEMING/LEWIS COUNTY LINE PL
(14CCN) (16CCR) (18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 7,480,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,480,000 0
Lewis 10099 KY-1068 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 1068 OVER LAUREL PL
FORK (068B00058N) DN BRZ 135,373
RW
UT
CN BRZ 902,486
Project Cost: 0 1,037,859 0
Total for Lewis county PL
DN 135,373
RW 7,480,000
UT
CN 902,486
Total Amounts: 0 8,517,859 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 107
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lincoln 167 US-27 US-27 CORRIDOR FROM SOMERSET TO LEXINGTON. IMPROVE PL
SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-27 FROM KY-1247 TO DN
EDUCATION WAY. (2022CCR) RW NH 12,390,000
UT NH 14,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 12,390,000 14,000,000 0
Lincoln 10055 KY-3246 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LINCOLN COUNTY ON (069B00068N) KY-3246 PL
AT FALL LICK CREEK DN BRX 113,937
RW
UT
CN BRX 759,580
Project Cost: 0 0 873,517
Lincoln 20016 US-27 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-27 FROM MILEPOINT 17.526 TO PL
MILEPOINT 18.155 DN STP5 120,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,380,000
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Lincoln 80000 US-127 NEW TURNING LANE AT ARCADIA VIEW DRIVE(18CCN) (2020CCR) PL
DN SPP 350,000
RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 300,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 350,000 510,000
Lincoln 80110 CR-1043 INSTALL GUARD RAIL ON GOSHEN RD AT DIX RIVER BRIDGE PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0

108 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lincoln 80201 US-27 Continue ongoing improvements to US 27 Corridor from Somerset to PL NH 400,000
Lexington. Improve Level of Service and safety on US 27 from KY 328 DN NH 2,680,000
to KY 501 in Lincoln County. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 2,680,000 0
Lincoln 80202 KY-300 RECONSTRUCTION TO MITIGATE ROCKSLIDE DAMAGE ON KY 300 PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 700,000
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 700,000 850,000
Lincoln 80300 US-150 Improve Safety and Access Control along US 150 from Danville to PL
Stanford. (2024CCN) DN NH 1,500,000
RW NH 1,050,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,500,000 1,050,000 0
Lincoln 80400 US-27 Continue ongoing improvements to US 27 corridor from Somerset to PL
Lexington. Improve Level of Service and safety on US 27 from KY 70 DN NH 1,876,200
at Eubank in Pulaski to KY 328 in Lincoln County. RW NH 5,315,900
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,876,200 0 5,315,900
Total for Lincoln county PL 400,000
DN 3,376,200 3,850,000 113,937
RW 12,390,000 1,050,000 6,055,900
UT 14,000,000 620,000
CN 30,000 1,380,000 759,580
Total Amounts: 16,196,200 20,280,000 7,549,417

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 109
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Livingston 80418 KY-453 Improve safety and substandard geometrics in curve along KY 453 PL
(Dover Rd.) from I-24 Exit 31 to Easter Day Rd. (MP 4.401 - 5.314) DN SPP 300,000
RW SPP 350,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN
Project Cost: 300,000 600,000 0
Total for Livingston county PL
DN 300,000
RW 350,000
UT 250,000
CN
Total Amounts: 300,000 600,000 0
Logan 80050 US-79 WIDEN US-79 FROM TODD COUNTY LINE TO INTERSECTION WITH PL
RUSSELLVILLE BYPASS.(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCN) DN NH 11,370,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 11,370,000 0 0
Logan 80414 US-79 Widen US 79 from Todd County line to Russellville Bypass. (Estimates PL
based on preliminary engineering. Design funds allocated under Logan DN
Co. Item No. 03-80050) RW NH 7,800,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,800,000 0
Logan 80415 US-68 Improve safety at the US 68/US 431, US 68/Newtown Road, and US PL
68/KY 79 intersections. (MP 12.265 - 12.465) DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0

110 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Logan county PL
DN 11,370,000 500,000
RW 7,800,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 11,370,000 8,300,000 0
Lyon 187.5000 US-62, RELOCATE US-641 FROM US-62 NEAR EDDYVILLE TO SOUTH OF PL
US-641 THE LYON/CALDWELL COUNTY LINE (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT STPF 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 0
Lyon 10158 KY-903 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LYON COUNTY ON (072B00047N) KY-903 AT I PL
24 @ MP. 51.718 DN FBP2 74,852
RW
UT
CN FBP2 499,016
Project Cost: 0 0 573,868
Lyon 10197 KY-819 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES ON BRIDGE ON KY-819 OVER PANTHER PL
CREEK (072B00031N) DN FBP 137,213
RW
UT
CN FBP 914,756
Project Cost: 0 1,051,969 0
Lyon 80312 US-62 ON US 62 WHERE THE P&L RAIL OVERPASS MEETS THE TWO (2) KY PL
810 INTERSECTIONS, RECONSTRUCT US 62/KY 810 (NORTH AND DN NH 750,000
SOUTH) INTERSECTIONS WITH TURN LANES OR OTHER MEASURE TO RW
IMPROVE LINE OF SIGHT AND SAFETY ISSUES. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 111
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Lyon county PL
DN 887,213 74,852
RW
UT 2,080,000
CN 914,756 499,016
Total Amounts: 2,080,000 1,801,969 573,868
Madison 4702 KY-876 Intersection Improvements at Barnes Mill Road (KY 876) and Goggins PL
Lane (CR 1303). DN
RW SPP 240,000
UT SPP 480,000
CN SPP 1,352,000
Project Cost: 0 240,000 1,832,000
Madison 8853 CR-1236, PROPOSED ROADWAY IMPROVEMENTS FROM DUNCANNON RD TO PL
KY-2877, THE MADISON CO AIRPORT TO INCLUDE CALEAST RD (KY 2881 DN
KY-2881 MP.783-MP 2.780), JOHN BALLARD RD (KY 2877 MP0-MP.806 & CR RW
1236 MP0-MP.429) FROM MENELAUS TO AIRPORT RD, & A NEW
UT
BRIDGE OVER SILVER CR.(14CCN)(16CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR)
CN HGC 17,830,000
Project Cost: 0 17,830,000 0
Madison 80201 KY-1983, New road that extends from Menelaus Road (KY 1983) at existing MP PL
PF-9999 2.851 to Mayde Road in Berea. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 4,330,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,330,000
Madison 80316 I -75 New construction/modification of the I-75 exit 87 interchange as PL
referenced in the West Richmond Small Urban Area Study (2024CCN) DN
RW NH 193,000
UT NH 420,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 193,000 420,000

112 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Madison 80362 CR-1303 Relieve congestion and safety improvements on CR 1303 (Goggins PL
Lane) between KY 169 and US 25 at Victory Drive (MP 0.979 to DN SPP 750,000
0.363). (Memorandum of Agreement with Madison County to Design RW
and Construct, Madison County to provide $2 million for right of way
UT
acquisition and utilities relocation.)(2024CCN)
CN SPP 9,120,000
Project Cost: 0 750,000 9,120,000
Madison 80421 FF-9999 Extend Farristown Industrial Drive at Menelaus Rd (KY 1983) to the PL
east to connect to US 25. DN SPP 800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 800,000 0 0
Madison 80429 KY-1986 Provide an additional connection for Union City Road (KY 1986) to the PL
Robert Martin Bypass located east of the railroad. (MP 0-0.4) DN SPP 450,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 450,000
Madison 80430 KY-52 Improve capacity on KY 52 (Lancaster Ave) beginning south of PL
Elizabeth St/Carnes Rd to north of Kit Carson Dr. (MP 9.997 - 10.346) DN SPP 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 0 0
Total for Madison county PL
DN 1,800,000 750,000 450,000
RW 433,000
UT 900,000
CN 17,830,000 14,802,000
Total Amounts: 1,800,000 19,013,000 16,152,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 113
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Magoffin 213 KY-40 ROADWAY IMPROVEMENTS AND SIDEWALK CONSTRUCTION ALONG PL
KY 40 (MP 0.145-0.660) TO BETTER FACILITATE ALTERNATIVE DN
TRANSPORTATION METHODS (2018BOP). (2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT STPF 1,560,000
CN
Project Cost: 1,560,000 0 0
Magoffin 80302 KY-7 RECONSTRUCT KY 7 FROM WILL BAILEY BRANCH ROAD TO KY PL
1090. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,260,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,260,000 0
Total for Magoffin county PL
DN 1,260,000
RW
UT 1,560,000
CN
Total Amounts: 1,560,000 1,260,000 0
Marion 3025 KY-52 Construct Phase 2 of the Loretto Sidewalk Project consisting on 3,900 PL
LF of 5-foot wide sidewalk along St. Francis Highway (KY 52) from DN
near Schoolhouse Drive to the intersection of KY 49 and HWY 52, RW
northern terminus of the Phase 1 project, in the City of Loretto.
UT
(2024CCN)
CN SPP 177,000
Project Cost: 0 177,000 0
Marion 10059 KY-152 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARION COUNTY ON (078B00037N) KY-152 AT PL
COLEMANS RUN CREEK DN BRX 234,738
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,564,920
Project Cost: 0 0 1,799,658

114 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Marion 80259 KY-2154, IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY AND CONGESTION BETWEEN US 68 AND PL
KY-55, KY 55 ON THE EAST SIDE OF LEBANON (APPROXIMATELY 2 MILES) DN
PF-9999, (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW STPF 5,000,000
US-68
UT STPF 1,560,000
CN STPF 1,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 2,560,000
Marion 80312 CR-1129 RECONSTRUCT BILL SAMUEL'S JR RD (CR1129) AND MAKER'S MARK PL
RD (CR1309) FROM NEAR BURK SPRING RD (CR1307) INTERSECTION DN
TO HICKORY CAMP RD (CR1224) INTERSECTION TO IMPROVE RW
ACCESS, SAFETY, AND CONNECTIVITY AND MOBILITY (DESIGN,
UT
RIGHT OF WAY, AND UTILITY PHASES TO BE PAID FOR OR DONATED
CN CRP 8,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 8,000,000
Marion 80411 KY-49 Improve sight distance at vertical curve by lowering the top of the hill PL
while raising the road in the sag. DN SPP 150,000
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 450,000
CN SPP 1,000,000
Project Cost: 0 400,000 1,450,000
Marion 80412 KY-49 ADDRESS ROADWAY FLOODING ALONG KY 49 FROM MILEPOINT PL
6.000 SOUTH OF NARROWS ROAD TO MILEPOINT 8.700 NORTH OF DN PROT 750,000
BIG SOUTH FORK. (TO REPLACE MARION COUNTY SYP 4-8715.00) RW PROT 500,000
UT PROT 600,000
CN PROT 2,500,000
Project Cost: 0 4,350,000 0
Marion 80414 KY-429 Add guardrail on KY 429 (MP 1.065 - 1.126) PL
DN GR 25,000
RW GR 10,000
UT GR 300,000
CN GR 165,000
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Total for Marion county PL
DN 925,000 234,738
RW 5,760,000
UT 900,000 2,010,000
CN 2,842,000 11,564,920
Total Amounts: 0 10,427,000 13,809,658

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 115
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Marshall 398 US-62 IMPROVE ACCESS AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-62 FROM PL
KY-95 TO THE EXISTING FOUR-LANE HIGHWAY AT LONE VALLEY DN
RD NEAR I-24 INTERCHANGE AND FUTURE I-69 CONNECTION. RW
(2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN CRP 7,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,500,000
Marshall 10171 KY-795 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARSHALL COUNTY ON (079B00014N) KY-795 PL
AT CHESTNUT CREEK DN BRZ 199,072
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,327,146
Project Cost: 1,526,218 0 0
Marshall 22074 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 40.088 TO PL
MILEPOINT 50.547 DN NHPM 800,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,953,756
Project Cost: 0 8,753,756 0
Marshall 80311 US-641 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY, PL
SERVICE, AND CONGESTION ISSUES FROM BENTON BAPTIST TEMPLE DN NH 1,500,000
ROAD / HAPPY HOLLOW RD TO US 68 IN DRAFFENVILLE. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Total for Marshall county PL
DN 199,072 2,300,000
RW
UT
CN 1,327,146 7,953,756 7,500,000
Total Amounts: 1,526,218 10,253,756 7,500,000

116 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 192 KY-40 IMPROVE ALIGNMENT AND GEOMETRICS OF THE CURVE LOCATED PL
JUST BEFORE THE JUNCTION OF KY-2031 AND KY-40 TO .1 MILES DN
BEFORE GORDON HOLLOW ROAD, AND IMPROVE THE RW
CULVERT/SAFETY DESIGN TO INCREASE MOTORIST AND
UT
PEDESTRIAN SAFETY. (12CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN CRP 1,974,700
Project Cost: 0 0 1,974,700
Martin 4333 KY-3 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Martin 4335 KY-3 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Martin 4347 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Martin 4348 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 117
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 4349 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Martin 4405 KY-2031 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2031 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Martin 4449 KY-1439 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1439 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0
Martin 4454 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 31,000
Project Cost: 31,000 0 0
Martin 4480 KY-908 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-908 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0

118 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 10127 KY-40 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARTIN COUNTY ON (080B00005N) KY-40 AT PL
ROCKCASTLE CREEK DN
RW FBP2 50,000
UT FBP2 200,000
CN FBP2 4,472,753
Project Cost: 0 0 4,722,753
Martin 10151 KY-3407 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 3407 OVER Wolf Creek PL
(080B00028N) DN
RW BRX 50,000
UT BRX 135,000
CN BRX 1,921,219
Project Cost: 0 0 2,106,219
Martin 80412 KY-908 Address safety concerns, substandard roadway geometrics, and PL
pavement conditions on KY-908 from Reservoir Road to Helen Mills DN SPP 250,000
Road. 1.5 miles (MP 6.705-8.182) RW SPP 75,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 175,000 0
Total for Martin county PL
DN 250,000
RW 75,000 100,000
UT 100,000 335,000
CN 535,000 8,368,672
Total Amounts: 785,000 175,000 8,803,672
Mason 4325 KY-10 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-10 IN MASON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 74,000
Project Cost: 74,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 119
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Mason 20030 KY-9 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-9 FROM MILEPOINT 7.147 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.256 DN NHPM 400,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,600,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Mason 80413 KY-9 Improve the operational efficiency for northbound traffic on KY-9 (AA PL
Highway) at the intersection with Kenton Station Drive (hospital DN SPP 180,000
entrance) (MP10.6-10.9) RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN
Project Cost: 180,000 750,000 0
Mason 80414 KY-9 Improve safety and operational efficiency of intersection of KY 9 (AA PL
Highway) and KY 11. (MP 7.46-7.66) DN SPP 250,000
RW
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 1,000,000
Project Cost: 250,000 1,500,000 0
Total for Mason county PL
DN 430,000 400,000
RW 250,000
UT 1,000,000
CN 74,000 1,000,000 4,600,000
Total Amounts: 504,000 2,250,000 5,000,000
McCracken 142 US-62 Address issues with service, congestion and safety from US 45 to PL
I-24 in Paducah. See March, 2002 Paducah-McCracken County DN
Transportation Study. (2024CCN) RW STP1 5,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,500,000 0

120 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCracken 153.2000 KY-1286 Extend KY 1286 from KY 998 (MP 6.916) to US 60. (Priority Section 2) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 7,500,000
Project Cost: 7,500,000 0 0
McCracken 153.3000 KY-1286 Improve KY 1286 from US 62(MP 5.000) to Perkins Creek Bridge (MP PL
5.896, B00167N). (Priority Section 3) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 2,750,000
UT STP1 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,750,000 2,160,000
McCracken 153.4000 KY-1286 Improve KY 1286 from Perkins Creek Bridge (MP 5.896, B00167N) to PL
KY 998 (MP 6.916). (Priority Section 4) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT STP1 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,160,000 0
McCracken 10162 KY-3520 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCRACKEN COUNTY ON (073B00030N) PL
KY-3520 AT P&L RAILWAY DN BRZ 456,086
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,040,571
Project Cost: 0 3,496,657 0
McCracken 10166 I -24 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCRACKEN COUNTY ON (073B00100N) I-24 AT PL
OHIO RIVER DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 23,100,000
Project Cost: 0 23,100,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 121
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCracken 10261 I -24 Planning and Phase I Engineering for the future expansion or PL
replacement of the I-24 Ohio River Bridge. (Shared Cost w/ Illinois) DN
(073B00100N) RW
UT
CN BRO 1,375,000 1,375,000
Project Cost: 0 1,375,000 1,375,000
McCracken 20017 I -24 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-024 FROM MILEPOINT 16.172 TO PL
MILEPOINT 17.32 DN STP3 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 800,000
Project Cost: 0 880,000 0
McCracken 80406 US-60 Improve safety, congestion, mobility, and access at the Intersection of PL
US 60 with Coleman Rd. and James Sanders Blvd. DN NH 900,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 900,000 0
McCracken 80408 US-60 Improve traffic flow, minimize congestion, and address safety PL
concerns on US 60 from New Holt Road to Tractor Supply DN NH 800,000
RW NH 750,000
UT NH 500,000
CN NH 2,250,000
Project Cost: 800,000 1,250,000 2,250,000
Total for McCracken county PL
DN 800,000 1,436,086
RW 9,000,000
UT 2,660,000 2,160,000
CN 7,500,000 28,315,571 3,625,000
Total Amounts: 8,300,000 41,411,657 5,785,000

122 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCreary 10059 KY-1470 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCREARY COUNTY ON (074B00020N) KY-1470 PL
AT MARSH CREEK DN BRX 156,474
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,043,159
Project Cost: 0 0 1,199,633
McCreary 80102 US-27 PROVIDE CONNECTIVITY, IMPROVE MOBILITY AND RESPONSE FROM PL
US 27 TO MCCREARY COUNTY HIGH SCHOOL (2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN CRP 700,000
Project Cost: 0 700,000 0
McCreary 80103 CR-1199 Improve mobility and safety RR crossing elimination by constructing PL
bridge and realigning KY 1470, approx 0.177 miles west of CR1199A DN
(Dick Wilson Rd) and extending easterly to US 27. (2020CCN) RW SPP 750,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 0
McCreary 80406 US-27 Improve safety and mobility along US27 at KY2792/ KY1651 and PL
widen approach routes 1500 feet on each side of US 27 in Pine Knot DN NH 320,000
RW NH 480,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 320,000 0 480,000
Total for McCreary county PL
DN 320,000 156,474
RW 750,000 480,000
UT
CN 700,000 1,043,159
Total Amounts: 320,000 1,450,000 1,679,633

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 123
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McLean 8400 US-431 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS AT THE INTERSECTION OF US-431 AND PL
KY-250. (08CCN)(12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,700,000
Project Cost: 1,700,000 0 0
McLean 10111 KY-81 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCLEAN COUNTY ON (075B00028N) KY-81 AT PL
UNNAMED STREAM DN BRX 133,805
RW
UT
CN BRX 892,032
Project Cost: 0 0 1,025,837
McLean 10116 KY-140 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCLEAN COUNTY ON (075B00040N) KY-140 PL
AT BR OF LONG FALLS CREEK DN BRX 224,659
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,497,726
Project Cost: 0 0 1,722,385
McLean 80401 KY-138 Improve safety of the intersection of KY-81 and KY-138 by adding a PL
conflict warning system. DN SPP 15,000
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 50,000
CN SPP 150,000
Project Cost: 265,000 50,000 150,000
Total for McLean county PL
DN 15,000 358,464
RW 250,000
UT 50,000
CN 1,700,000 2,539,758
Total Amounts: 1,965,000 50,000 2,898,222

124 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Meade 8705 KY-79 RECONSTRUCT KY 79 FROM KY 144 TO KY 1051. (12CCN)(14CCR) PL
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 17,280,000
Project Cost: 17,280,000 0 0
Meade 10078 KY-313 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 313 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
AND CO ROAD (082B00021N) DN BRX 475,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 3,525,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000
Meade 80309 KY-313 ADDRESS SAFETY AND MOBILITY ALONG KY 313 (BRANDENBURG PL
BYPASS) FROM KY 448 TO KY 228 IN BRANDENBURG. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 0
Meade 80415 KY-933 Perform embankment slope repairs along KY 933 (Olin Rd) near the PL
Doe Valley Lake Dam (MP 0.0 to 7.3) . Spots along the entire length, as DN
noted in the study. RW
UT
CN SPP 750,000
Project Cost: 0 0 750,000
Total for Meade county PL
DN 2,000,000 475,000
RW
UT
CN 17,280,000 4,275,000
Total Amounts: 17,280,000 2,000,000 4,750,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 125
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Menifee 250 US-460 Reconstruction of US 460 from Lucky Stop to KY 713 @ Means. PL
(2024CCN) DN STP2 600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 600,000 0 0
Menifee 8805 US-460 WIDEN EXISTING ROADWAY AND IMPROVE VERTICAL AND PL
HORIZONTAL CURVES. NEW CONSTRUCTION. COMPLETES US 460 DN SPP 3,930,000
UPGRADES IN MENIFEE COUNTY FROM MP 14.35 TO 19.39 AND IN RW
MORGAN COUNTY FROM MP 0 TO MP 0.8. (14CCN)(16CCR)
UT
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,930,000 0
Menifee 80201 US-460 Improve safety, correct geometrics, and enhance regional connectivity PL
on US 460 from the bridge over Dog Trot Fork (MP 3.3) to Rothwell (MP DN
4.8). (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT STPF 1,985,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,985,000 0
Total for Menifee county PL
DN 600,000 3,930,000
RW
UT 1,985,000
CN
Total Amounts: 600,000 5,915,000 0
Mercer 417 CS-1237 IMPROVE SYSTEM MOBILITY ALONG MOBERLY ROAD FROM KY 390 PL
TO KY 1989 IN NORTHWEST HARRODSBURG. (12CCR) (2020CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 420,000
UT SPP 390,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 420,000 390,000

126 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Mercer 80355 US-127 Improve level of safety and access at and around the intersection of PL
US 127 and KY 598 (Sparrow Lane). (MP 2.676 - 2.776) (2024CCN) DN
RW CRP 40,000
UT CRP 170,000
CN CRP 750,000
Project Cost: 0 960,000 0
Mercer 80424 US-127 Improve access onto US 127 from the Industrial Park North of the PL
Harrodsburg Bypass. Consider design/build. DN SPP 350,000
RW SPP 100,000
UT SPP 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 350,000 250,000 0
Total for Mercer county PL
DN 350,000
RW 560,000
UT 320,000 390,000
CN 750,000
Total Amounts: 350,000 1,630,000 390,000
Metcalfe 112.1000 KY-90 SUMMER SHADE BYPASS. (06CCR)(2006BOPC)(08CCR)(12CCR) PL
(14CCR) (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,240,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,240,000 0 0
Metcalfe 80416 KY-90 Improve safety and mobility on KY 90 between the Barren County Line PL
and KY 640 in Summer Shade. (MP 0-3.283) DN SPP 750,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 750,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 127
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Metcalfe county PL
DN 2,240,000 750,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 2,240,000 0 750,000
Monroe 128.1100 KY-214 OPERATION OF TURKEY NECK BEND FERRY FOR FY 2027-2032. PL
(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,250,000 1,250,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 1,250,000
Monroe 10044 KY-678 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MONROE COUNTY ON (086B00040N) KY-678 AT PL
SKAGGS CREEK DN BRX 301,224
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,008,159
Project Cost: 0 0 2,309,383
Monroe 80401 KY-163 Reconstruct or realign KY 163 (Celina Road) from Tennessee State PL
Line to Tompkinsville Bypass DN SPP 2,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,500,000 0
Monroe 80419 KY-100 Improve safety and mobility on KY 100 at the narrow bridge over PL
Spring Creek. (MP1.72-1.77) DN SPP 250,000
RW SPP 75,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 425,000 0

128 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Monroe 80420 KY-100 Improve safety and mobility on KY 100 at the narrow bridge over PL
Indian Creek. (MP 4-4.1) DN SPP 250,000
RW SPP 75,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 425,000
Total for Monroe county PL
DN 2,750,000 551,224
RW 75,000 75,000
UT 100,000 100,000
CN 1,250,000 3,258,159
Total Amounts: 0 4,175,000 3,984,383
Montgomery 240 KY-1991 WIDEN KY-1991 FROM MAYSVILLE ROAD TO MIDLAND TRAIL PL
INDUSTRIAL PARK, MONTGOMERY COUNTY. (SEE 7-8501.00 FOR DN
"SPB" FUNDS) (2005HPP-KY129) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP1 3,050,000
Project Cost: 3,050,000 0 0
Montgomery 411 KY-1991 UPGRADE HINKSTON PIKE IN MT. STERLING FROM NEW MIDLAND PL
TRAIL TO THE NEW INDUSTRIAL PARK ENTRANCE (INCLUDES DN
EXTENSION OF INDUSTRIAL ACCESS ROAD TO HINKSTON PIKE). RW SPP 620,000
(12CCR)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 620,000 0
Montgomery 8810 US-60 WIDEN EXISTING PAVEMENT & IMPROVE VERTICAL & HORIZONTAL PL
CURVES FROM EXISTING MT STERLING BYPASS (KY 686) TO 500' W DN
OF BENTBROOK SUBDIVISION. ADD FULL WIDTH SHOULDERS & A RW
CENTER TURNING LANE IN CONGESTION AREAS FROM MP 2.2 TO
UT SPP 5,730,000
4.311.(14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,730,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 129
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Montgomery 80423 US-460 Reconstruct US-460 from Cardinal Ln to US-60 in Mount Sterling. This PL
should include a consistent urban typical and other geometric DN STP1 2,250,000
improvements. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,250,000 0 0
Total for Montgomery county PL
DN 2,250,000
RW 620,000
UT 5,730,000
CN 3,050,000
Total Amounts: 5,300,000 6,350,000 0
Morgan 8402 KY-7 RECONSTRUCT KY-7 FROM MILE POST 2.7 TO MILE POST 5.6 PL
(JUNCTION 519 TO SOUTH SIDE OF WRIGLEY HILL) DN
RW STP2 2,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,750,000 0
Morgan 8804 KY-2498 IMPROVE KY-2498 FROM US-460 TO THE ARH HOSPITAL. (14CCN) PL
(16CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 8,790,000
Project Cost: 8,790,000 0 0
Morgan 80401 US-460 Improve sight distance at intersection of US 460 and KY 2499 PL
(Dogwood Lane) in West Liberty DN SPP 50,000
RW SPP 50,000
UT SPP 125,000
CN SPP 200,000
Project Cost: 50,000 175,000 200,000

130 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Morgan county PL
DN 50,000
RW 2,800,000
UT 125,000
CN 8,790,000 200,000
Total Amounts: 8,840,000 2,925,000 200,000
Muhlenberg 8802 KY-181 WIDEN KY-181 BY FOUR FEET ON EACH SIDE FROM INTERSECTION PL
601 TO WENDELL FORD CENTER. (14CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 6,320,000
Project Cost: 6,320,000 0 0
Muhlenberg 10122 KY-181 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MUHLENBERG COUNTY ON (089B00031N) PL
KY-181 AT BAT EAST CREEK DN BRX 215,380
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,435,867
Project Cost: 1,651,247 0 0
Muhlenberg 22162 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 45.95 TO MILEPOINT 52.535 DN NHPM 870,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 8,730,000
Project Cost: 0 0 9,600,000
Muhlenberg 22165 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 59.92 TO MILEPOINT 65.375 DN NHPM 410,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,150,380
Project Cost: 0 4,560,380 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 131
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Muhlenberg 80201 WK-9001 WESTERN KENTUCKY PKY - RECONSTRUCT INTERCHANGE AT US PL
431 AT CENTRAL CITY (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 700,000
RW SPP 1,380,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 0
Total for Muhlenberg county PL
DN 915,380 410,000 870,000
RW 1,380,000
UT
CN 7,755,867 4,150,380 8,730,000
Total Amounts: 10,051,247 4,560,380 9,600,000
Nelson 396.1000 US-150 IMPROVE SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND GEOMETRICS ON US-150 FROM PL
THE BLUEGRASS PARKWAY TO THE NELSON/WASHINGTON DN
COUNTY LINE. (2016BOP)(18CCR)(D-Auth under 4-396) (2022CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN STPF 4,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 5,000,000
Nelson 4319 KY-458 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-458 IN NELSON COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 311,000
Project Cost: 311,000 0 0
Nelson 8307.2500 KY-245 Address safety and mobility along KY 245 from the existing 5 lane PL
section at Flaget Hospital (MP 7.720) to just north of Hall Loop (MP DN
9.020). Improve intersection of KY 245 and KY 509. RW STPF 400,000
UT STPF 1,000,000
CN STPF 7,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,400,000 7,000,000

132 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nelson 8308.1000 US-150 WIDEN US-150 FROM KY-49 TO NEAR KY-245/WAL-MART WIDENING. PL
(06CCN) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 3,500,000
UT STP1 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,500,000 2,080,000
Nelson 20052 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 8.837 TO MILEPOINT 10.172 DN STP5 50,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 537,400
Project Cost: 0 587,400 0
Nelson 22173 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 10.172 TO MILEPOINT 17.542 (17.134 CARDINAL) DN NHPM 550,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,500,000
Project Cost: 6,050,000 0 0
Nelson 22174 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 17.134 (17.542 NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT DN NHPM 1,600,000
24.095 RW
UT
CN NHPM 16,000,000
Project Cost: 0 17,600,000 0
Nelson 22176 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 35.15 TO MILEPOINT 39.267 DN NHPM 730,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,270,000
Project Cost: 0 0 8,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 133
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nelson 80363 US-31 Improve traffic operations, mobility and passing opportunities along US PL
31 E (Louisville - Bardstown Rd) from KY 509 to Bullitt County Line. DN STPF 2,320,000
Consider a 2+1 configuration and/or innovative intersections. (MP RW STPF 320,000
20.536 - 27.428) (2024CCN)
UT STPF 620,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,320,000 940,000
Nelson 80416 US-62 ADDRESS CONGESTION ALONG US 62 IN BARDSTOWN FROM KY PL
245 TO KY 605. (MP 15.894-17.209) DN SPP 800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 800,000 0 0
Nelson 80417 KY-245 Preliminary Design to improve safety and congestion from Kelly Drive PL
to US 31E (MP 3.346-3.661) DN SPP 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Total for Nelson county PL
DN 1,350,000 4,970,000 730,000
RW 3,900,000 320,000
UT 1,000,000 2,700,000
CN 5,811,000 20,537,400 19,270,000
Total Amounts: 7,161,000 30,407,400 23,020,000
Nicholas 205 KY-36 IMPROVE THE KY-36/KY-32 INTERSECTION NEAR THE NICHOLAS PL
COUNTY SCHOOL PROPERTY (12CCR)(16CCR)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW STP2 2,100,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,100,000 0 0

134 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nicholas 10103 KY-32 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 32 OVER PL
TRIB-HOOKTOWN BRANCH (091B00031N) DN BRX 58,818
RW
UT
CN BRX 392,122
Project Cost: 0 450,940 0
Nicholas 80407 KY-386 Improve access along KY 386 (Carpenter Pike) from US 68 to new PL
industrial site. DN SPP 750,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 0
Total for Nicholas county PL
DN 808,818
RW 2,100,000
UT
CN 392,122
Total Amounts: 2,100,000 1,200,940 0
Ohio 127 US-62 Address Drainage Issues on US 62 in Ohio County PL
DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 2,400,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,400,000
Ohio 4302 KY-69 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-69 IN OHIO COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 135
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Ohio 4303 KY-69 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-69 IN OHIO COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Ohio 80408 KY-69 Address the safety concerns of KY-69 from Sunnydale Road to PL
KY-54 at Fordsville. DN SPP 2,550,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,550,000 0
Total for Ohio county PL
DN 2,550,000
RW
UT
CN 90,000 2,400,000
Total Amounts: 90,000 2,550,000 2,400,000
Oldham 234 KY-146, KY-393 RECONSTRUCT FROM 140FEET SOUTH OF RAILROAD PL
KY-393 CROSSING (CSX) EXTENDING NORTHWEST TOWARDS KY 146 DN
ENDING AT STATION 12+00 (DESIGN UNDER 5-230.00). RW
(CONSTRUCTION SEQ.#2) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN STPF 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 10,000,000
Oldham 304.1000 KY-22 Reconstruct KY 22 from KY 329 to Abbott Lane, Including Rail PL
Crossing Improvement in the vicinity of KY 329 (Railroad Ave) and DN SPP 2,260,000
CSX Railroad to improve safety and freight mobility through Crestwood RW
(KY 329 – MP 8.840-8.935 and KY 1408 – MP 2.900-3.132)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,260,000 0

136 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 483.1000 I -71 WIDEN I-71 FROM FOUR TO SIX LANES FROM KY-329 (MP 14.1) TO PL
KY-393 (MP 18.0). (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 1,900,000
UT NH 2,500,000
CN NH 12,500,000
Project Cost: 1,900,000 2,500,000 12,500,000
Oldham 483.2000 I -71 WIDEN I-71 FROM FOUR TO SIX LANES FROM KY-393 (MP 18.0) TO PL
KY-53 (MP 22.4). (16CCN) (2024CCR) DN NH 6,160,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,160,000 0
Oldham 483.4000 I -71 Addition of soundwall on I-71 SB along Darby Pointe Neighborhood PL
(MP 16.7-17.4) (To be let with 5-483.1 I-71 Widening). (2024CCN) DN SPP 220,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 6,225,000
Project Cost: 220,000 6,225,000 0
Oldham 8852 KY-53 DESIGN FOR IMPROVING KY-53 FROM ZHALE SMITH ROAD TO KY-22 PL
(TOTAL 3.2 MILES). (14CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,790,000
UT SPP 730,000
CN SPP 36,400,000
Project Cost: 1,790,000 730,000 36,400,000
Oldham 22098 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 14.38 TO MILEPOINT 18.07 DN NHPM 750,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,550,000
Project Cost: 0 8,300,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 137
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 80005 I -71 IMPROVE THE INTERCHANGE OF I 71 AND KY 329. (18CCN) PL
(2020CCR) (DESIGNED UNDER 5-483.10) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN NH 430,000
RW NH 1,160,000
UT NH 1,050,000
CN
Project Cost: 430,000 1,160,000 1,050,000
Oldham 80050 KY-329 Construct a turn lane on KY-329 bypass at Dovefield Drive PL
DN SPP 200,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 600,000
Project Cost: 200,000 0 600,000
Oldham 80209 KY-53 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 53 from I-71 to Zhale PL
Smith Road. Includes consideration of a five lane widening and bike/ DN STPF 1,600,000
ped accommodations. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,600,000 0 0
Oldham 80210 KY-146 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 146 (LaGrange Road) PL
from KY 329B (KY 329 Bypass) to KY 393. Includes consideration of DN SPP 3,300,000
a four lane widening and bike/ped accommodations. (2022CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,300,000 0
Oldham 80211 KY-524 Landslide repair on Westport Road (KY-524) from JCT. US-42 West, PL
north 1.0 mile. (2002BOPC)(NOT REQUIRED) (2022CCN) DN SPP 650,000
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN
Project Cost: 650,000 1,030,000 0

138 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 80307 US-42 IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW, MINIMIZE CONGESTION, AND ADDRESS PL
SAFETY ISSUES ON US 42 BETWEEN RIDGMOOR DRIVE AND KY DN NH 3,500,000
1694 (GUM STREET). INCLUDES CONSIDERATION OF A THREE LANE RW
WIDENING AND BIKE/PED ACCOMMODATIONS. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,500,000 0
Oldham 80313 I-71 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE I-71/KY 53 PL
(NORTH/SOUTH FIRST AVENUE) INTERCHANGE. INCLUDES DN NH 800,000
CONSIDERATION OF AN ADDITIONAL LEFT-TURN LANE ON NB KY 53 RW NH 200,000
TO THE SB I-71 ON-RAMP. REQUIRES MINOR WIDENING OF KY 53
UT NH 200,000
BRIDGE (093B0002N) AND RAMP. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 800,000 400,000 0
Oldham 80314 KY-362 IMPROVE SAFETY, ACCESS, AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL SPP 210,000
DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 362 FROM THE OLDHAM/SHELBY COUNTY DN SPP 1,960,000
LINE TO KY 146 (IN AND SOUTH OF PEWEE VALLEY). INCLUDES RW
CONSIDERATION OF A 3 LANE WIDENING WITH A TWO WAY LEFT
UT
TURN LANE AND BIKE/PED ACCOMMODATIONS. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 210,000 1,960,000
Oldham 80325 KY-146 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL
ON KY 146 IN BUCKNER FROM KY 1817 (NEW CUT ROAD) (MP 6.81) DN SPP 510,000
TO KY 393 (MP 7.42). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 510,000 0
Oldham 80344 I -71 ADDITION OF SOUNDWALL ON I 71 NB ALONG SPRING HILL PL
SUBDIVISION. (As a part of the I-MOVE Expansion Project on I 71). DN SPP 210,000
(NOTE: Does not meet required noise wall environmental noise RW
analysis abatement eligibility requirements for federal funding.)
UT
(2024CCN)
CN SPP 3,400,000
Project Cost: 210,000 3,400,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 139
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 80345 KY-22 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION, ALONG US 22 FROM PL
HAUNZ LANE TO KY 329. (2024CCN) DN SPP 330,000
RW SPP 840,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 330,000 840,000 0
Oldham 80427 KY-146 Examine congestion, safety and mobility on KY 146 from KY 393 (mp PL SPP 250,000
7.64) to Fifth Avenue (CS 1044) (mp 10.67) DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Oldham 80428 I-71 Feasibility study for an additional connection on I-71 in northeast PL NH 500,000
Oldham County DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Total for Oldham county PL 250,000 710,000
DN 4,440,000 16,480,000 1,960,000
RW 3,690,000 2,730,000
UT 3,930,000 1,050,000
CN 17,175,000 59,500,000
Total Amounts: 8,380,000 41,025,000 62,510,000
Owen 80419 KY-1982 Resurfacing KY 1982 (MP 0.0 - 7.153) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 858,400
Project Cost: 0 858,400 0

140 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Owen 80420 KY-3548 Resurfacing KY 3548 (MP 0.0 - 3.53) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 345,400
Project Cost: 0 345,400 0
Owen 80421 KY-325 Resurfacing KY 325 (MP 0.0 - 5.642) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 752,300
Project Cost: 0 0 752,300
Total for Owen county PL
DN
RW
UT
CN 1,203,800 752,300
Total Amounts: 0 1,203,800 752,300
Owsley 80105 KY-11 RECONSTRUCT THE INTERSECTION OF KY 11 AND KY 846 (2020CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 3,490,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,490,000
Owsley 80402 KY-28 Construct a right turn lane on KY 28 at the Amburgey Rd. intersection PL
(MP 0.274) near the Owsley Co. Elementary School DN SPP 75,000
RW SPP 50,000
UT SPP 75,000
CN SPP 200,000
Project Cost: 75,000 325,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 141
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Owsley 80413 CR-1346 Improve pedestrian access/connectivity and safety by constructing PL
sidewalk on CR 1346K (Old KY 11) from approximately MP 0.013 to MP DN SPP 30,000
0.071. City and County will be responsible for right of way and utilities. RW
UT
CN SPP 260,000
Project Cost: 0 290,000 0
Owsley 80414 KY-30 Improve pedestrian access/connectivity and safety by constructing PL
sidewalk on KY 30 from approximately MP 8.694 to MP 8.818. City and DN SPP 65,000
County will be responsible for right of way and utilities. RW
UT
CN SPP 650,000
Project Cost: 0 715,000 0
Owsley 80415 KY-30 Repair roadway settlements on KY-30 between the KY-30/11 PL
intersection and Botner Road.(MP3.9-8.26) DN SPP 150,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,500,000
Project Cost: 150,000 1,500,000 0
Total for Owsley county PL
DN 225,000 95,000
RW 50,000
UT 75,000
CN 2,610,000 3,490,000
Total Amounts: 225,000 2,830,000 3,490,000
Pendleton 80306 US-27 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 27 AT THE KY 22 PL
INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) DN STPF 870,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 870,000 0 0

142 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Pendleton county PL
DN 870,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 870,000 0 0
Perry 178 KY-7 Address roadway slide on KY 7 from MP 9.8 to MP 10.0. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN PROT 4,270,000
Project Cost: 4,270,000 0 0
Perry 4317 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN PERRY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0
Perry 8903 HR-9006 NEW INTERCHANGE OFF OF A NEW EXIT 55 HAL ROGERS PL
PARKWAY. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 7,440,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,440,000
Perry 22204 HR-9006 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Hal Rogers Daniel Boone Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 57.185 TO MILEPOINT 59.088 DN NHPM 600,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,600,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 143
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Perry 80308 PF-9999 Construct a new access road to East Perry Sports Complex PL
development and a connector to Nautilus Drive (2024CCN) DN SPP 360,000
RW SPP 60,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN
Project Cost: 360,000 60,000 110,000
Total for Perry county PL
DN 360,000 600,000
RW 60,000
UT 110,000
CN 4,334,000 6,000,000 7,440,000
Total Amounts: 4,694,000 6,660,000 7,550,000
Pike 147 KY-1426 MITIGATE OR ELIMINATE ROCKFALL HAZARDS AND IMPROVE PL
ROADWAY FOR BETTER FLOW AND EFFICIENCY IN ORDER TO DN
HANDLE THE EXPECTED CONGESTION ARISING FROM EVENTS AT RW PROT 2,600,000
THE EXPO CENTER. IDENTIFIED IN THE 1999 PIKEVILLE URBAN STUDY,
UT PROT 1,500,000
FROM BILL KING RD. TO US 119. (2020CCR) ($7 MILLION
CN PROT 7,000,000
Project Cost: 4,100,000 0 7,000,000
Pike 182 CO-0 Pikeville Corridor Access and Safety Improvement Project with USDOT PL
SS4A Grant and $1,900,000 state matching funds. DN
RW
UT
CN KYD 7,400,000
SPP 1,900,000
Project Cost: 9,300,000 0 0
Pike 198 KY-194 IMPROVE KY 194 FROM US 119 RAMP NEAR SMITH FARMS BOTTOM PL
(CR 1458) TO NEAR DESKINS BRANCH CULVERT. (18CCR) DN
(2020CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 2,538,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 0 2,538,000 2,500,000

144 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 281 KY-194 CURVE REVISION AND PASSING LANES ON KY-194 NEAR DESKINS PL
BRANCH (08CCR)(12CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Pike 346 US-460 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE US-460 AND PL
KY-1460 INTERSECTION. (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 872,000
UT NH 860,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 872,000 860,000
Pike 4410 KY-1056 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1056 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Pike 4411 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Pike 4412 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 145
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4413 KY-1499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1499 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 150,000
Project Cost: 150,000 0 0
Pike 4414 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Pike 4415 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Pike 4416 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Pike 4417 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0

146 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4418 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Pike 4419 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Pike 4421 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Pike 4455 KY-122 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-122 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 32,000
Project Cost: 32,000 0 0
Pike 4456 KY-122 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-122 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 93,000
Project Cost: 93,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 147
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4457 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 36,000
Project Cost: 36,000 0 0
Pike 4458 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 22,000
Project Cost: 22,000 0 0
Pike 4459 KY-1499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1499 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 45,000
Project Cost: 45,000 0 0
Pike 4460 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 39,000
Project Cost: 39,000 0 0
Pike 4461 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 11,000
Project Cost: 11,000 0 0

148 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4462 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 17,000
Project Cost: 17,000 0 0
Pike 4463 KY-610 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-610 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Pike 10131 KY-308 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PIKE COUNTY ON (098B00009N) KY-308 AT PL
ROAD FK.ROAD CREEK DN
RW BRX 50,000
UT BRX 76,000
CN BRX 757,000
Project Cost: 0 0 883,000
Pike 10132 KY-1426 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PIKE COUNTY ON (098B00013N) KY-1426 AT PL
BENT BRANCH DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,375,883
Project Cost: 0 0 1,375,883
Pike 10152 US-119 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 119 OVER Tug Fork PL
(098B00001N) DN BRX 30,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,500,000
Project Cost: 0 1,530,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 149
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 10154 KY-610 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 610 OVER Shelby Creek PL
(098B00071N) DN
RW BRX 75,000
UT BRX 130,000
CN BRX 2,237,153
Project Cost: 2,442,153 0 0
Pike 80309 US-23 Make template changes to improve sight distance, drainage, and PL
ingress/egress through this commercial section of US 23 (2024CCN) DN NH 680,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 680,000 0
Pike 80403 KY-199 Improve geometric and drainage issues between MP 8.93 and 9.10. PL
DN SPP 250,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Pike 80408 KY-308 Install guardrail where roadway drops down to creek PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 175,000
Project Cost: 175,000 0 0
Total for Pike county PL
DN 250,000 710,000
RW 2,675,000 872,000 50,000
UT 1,630,000 936,000
CN 12,897,153 4,038,000 16,632,883
Total Amounts: 17,452,153 5,620,000 17,618,883

150 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Powell 176 KY-15 Minor widening to improve redundancy of Regional Travel. PL
DN
RW PROT 290,000
UT PROT 280,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 570,000 0
Powell 210 KY-213 IMPROVE SAFETY AND LEVEL OF SERVICE ON KY-213 IN POWELL PL
COUNTY FROM SONS ROAD TO REED COURT. (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 3,280,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,280,000
Powell 4318 KY-82 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-82 IN POWELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 32,000
Project Cost: 32,000 0 0
Powell 20005 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 19.228 TO MILEPOINT 22.307 DN STP4 270,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 2,645,726
Project Cost: 0 0 2,915,726
Powell 20035 KY-213 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-213 FROM MILEPOINT 1.691 TO PL
MILEPOINT 2.244 DN STP4 28,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 322,000
Project Cost: 0 350,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 151
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Powell 20042 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 22.307 TO MILEPOINT 27.376 DN STP5 200,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0
Powell 22158 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 27.376 TO MILEPOINT 32.787 DN NHPM 410,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,102,360
Project Cost: 0 0 4,512,360
Total for Powell county PL
DN 228,000 680,000
RW 290,000
UT 280,000
CN 32,000 2,322,000 10,028,086
Total Amounts: 32,000 3,120,000 10,708,086
Pulaski 59.5000 KY-80, SOMERSET NORTHERN BYPASS SECTION 3; FROM WEST OF THE PL
PF-9999 BRIDGE OVER US-27 AND THE SOUTHERN RR, E TO KY-39 N OF DN
BROYLES RD. (INCLUDES I-CHNG AT KY-39). (CONST SEQ. 3) RW
(2002BOP)(04KYD)(05KYD) (2024CCN)
UT
CN IF 42,000,000 42,000,000
NH 11,000,000
Project Cost: 0 53,000,000 42,000,000
Pulaski 59.6000 KY-80, Somerset Northern Bypass Section 4; From East of the KY 39 PL
PF-9999 Interchange, to KY 461 / KY 80 Interchange (8-59.25 - BUILD Grant DN
Project)(Congressional KYD Earmark - $45M) RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN IF 42,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 42,000,000

152 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pulaski 59.7000 CO-0, KY-80 SOMERSET NORTHERN BYPASS (I-66) FROM WEST OF THE BRIDGE PL
OVER US-27 TO KY 461/KY 80 INTERCHANGE. (REMAINING DN
ALLOCATED FY 24 CONGRESSIONAL EARMARK KYD FUNDING, RW
INCLUDING REQUIRED 20% STATE MATCHING FUNDS)
UT KYD 1,310,000
CN KYD 54,950,000
Project Cost: 56,260,000 0 0
Pulaski 121 KY-196 HORIZONTAL AND VERTICAL REALIGNMENT OF KY-196 AT WHITE PL
OAK CREEK FROM 1.0 MILE E OF WARNER ROAD TO 0.3 MILE W OF DN SPP 600,000
SIEVERS ROAD.(10CCR)(14CCR) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 600,000 0
Pulaski 272 US-27 Reduce congestion and improve safety and mobility along US 27 PL
between General Burnside Island and Cumberland River Bridge. DN
(2024CCN) RW NH 6,330,500
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,330,500 0
Pulaski 10069 KY-196 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PULASKI COUNTY ON (100B00102N) KY-196 AT PL
LITTLE WHITE OAK CREEK DN BRX 140,588
RW
UT
CN BRX 937,250
Project Cost: 0 0 1,077,838
Pulaski 22366 KY-39 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-39 FROM MILEPOINT 6.47 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.673 DN STP5 140,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,610,000
Project Cost: 1,750,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 153
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pulaski 80104 KY-90 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVE SAFETY, CAPACITY AND PL
MOBILITY ALONG KY 90 BETWEEN WAYNE COUNTY LINE AND NEW DN SPP 2,500,000
CUMBERLAND RIVER BRIDGE (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,500,000 0 0
Pulaski 80302 KY-461 Address safety, capacity and access issues along KY-461 from PL
south of Buck Creek extending northerly to Pulaski/Rockcastle Line (as DN SPP 2,976,000
a continuation of 8-59.25). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,976,000 0
Pulaski 80310 KY-914 Minor widening along KY-914 by adding turning lanes and relocating PL
an existing entrance into adjacent property. (2024CCN) DN SPP 100,000
RW
UT SPP 180,000
CN
Project Cost: 100,000 180,000 0
Pulaski 80350 KY-1642 Improve safety and congestion along KY 1642 at KY 1577 (MP 13.4 PL
-13.7) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 1,200,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,200,000 0 0
Pulaski 80416 KY-914 Install turning lane from KY 914 into Pulaski County Compost site (MP PL
9.4-9.6) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 80,000
Project Cost: 0 80,000 0
Total for Pulaski county PL
DN 2,740,000 3,576,000 140,588
RW 1,200,000 6,330,500
UT 1,310,000 180,000
CN 56,560,000 53,080,000 84,937,250
Total Amounts: 61,810,000 63,166,500 85,077,838

154 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Robertson 8711 KY-616 IMPROVE CURVE ON KY 616 AND IMPROVE ROADWAY FROM THE PL
NEW ROBERTSON COUNTY SCHOOL TO MT OLIVET. (12CCN) DN
(14CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 850,000 0
Robertson 80312 US-62 IMPROVE THE INTERSECTION OF US 62 AND KY 165 IN MOUNT PL
OLIVET. (2024CCN) DN SPP 390,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 390,000 0
Total for Robertson county PL
DN 390,000
RW 530,000
UT 320,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 1,240,000 0
Rockcastle 10071 CR-1086 BRIDGE PROJECT IN ROCKCASTLE COUNTY ON (102C00067N) PL
MARET CEMETERY RD AT ROUND STONE CREEK DN FBP2 136,244
RW
UT
CN FBP2 908,293
Project Cost: 0 1,044,537 0
Rockcastle 22111 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 FROM MILEPOINT 64.5 (65.22 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 68.78 DN NHPM 530,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,293,808
Project Cost: 0 0 5,823,808

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 155
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rockcastle 80303 KY-461 Address capacity and access issues along KY-461 from PL
Pulaski/Rockcastle County Line to KY 1250. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,527,800
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,527,800 0
Rockcastle 80305 US-25 Planning study on US 25 to address Connectivity for future PL SPP 250,000
development in Mt. Vernon on the western side of I-75 between exit DN
59 and exit 62. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 0
Rockcastle 80306 US-150 Address capacity issues from KY-461 to US-25 in Mt. Vernon to PL
continue corridor improvements to US 150 as identified in the 1998 DN STP1 1,081,200
planning study. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,081,200
Total for Rockcastle county PL 250,000
DN 2,664,044 1,611,200
RW
UT
CN 908,293 5,293,808
Total Amounts: 0 3,822,337 6,905,008
Rowan 204 KY-32 IMPROVE KY-32 FROM PARK HILLS DRIVE TO VIKING DRIVE NORTH. PL
(12CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 27,460,000
Project Cost: 27,460,000 0 0

156 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 3029 I -64 Rowan County East & West Bound Renovation located on I-64. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,100,000
Project Cost: 5,100,000 0 0
Rowan 4312 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Rowan 4315 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Rowan 4319 KY-3319 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3319 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Rowan 4320 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 157
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 4321 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Rowan 8406.1000 KY-377 IMPROVE SAFETY AND CONNECTIVITY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
ON KY-377 FROM KY-32 TO JUST SOUTH OF CLEAR FORK ROAD. DN
(2022BOP) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN STP2 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Rowan 8406.2000 KY-377 IMPROVE SAFETY AND CONNECTIVITY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
ON KY-377 FROM JUST SOUTH OF CLEARK FORK ROAD TO JUST DN
NORTH OF KY 799 (BIG PERRY ROAD). (2024CCN) RW STP2 6,600,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,600,000 0
Total for Rowan county PL
DN
RW 6,600,000
UT
CN 32,770,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Total Amounts: 32,770,000 11,600,000 5,000,000
Russell 156 US-127 Reduce congestion and improve capacity, safety and mobility on US PL
127 between the west bypass of Jamestown to the Cumberland DN NH 1,750,000
Parkway. See segment 12 in June 1998 Advance (2024CCR) RW NH 3,000,000
UT NH 3,000,000
CN NH 5,000,000
Project Cost: 1,750,000 6,000,000 5,000,000

158 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Russell 166 US-127 Reduce congestion and improve safety, capacity and mobility along US PL
127 from the Cumberland Parkway to Lakeway drive KY 379 in DN NH 2,000,000
Russell Springs. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Russell 10072 KY-379 BRIDGE PROJECT IN RUSSELL COUNTY ON (104B00003N) KY-379 AT PL
CROCUS CREEK DN BRZ 77,042
RW
UT
CN BRZ 513,615
Project Cost: 590,657 0 0
Russell 80316 KY-3278 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ALONG KY 3278. (2024CCN) PL
DN SPP 225,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 225,000
Russell 80417 CR-9999 Initial Asphalt treatment of Tony Sloan Way (MP 0 - 0.8) (Memorandum PL
of Agreement with Russell County to construct) DN
RW
UT
CN CRP 350,000
Project Cost: 0 350,000 0
Total for Russell county PL
DN 3,827,042 225,000
RW 3,000,000
UT 3,000,000
CN 513,615 350,000 5,000,000
Total Amounts: 4,340,657 6,350,000 5,225,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 159
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Scott 10013 CR-1020 BRIDGE PROJECT IN SCOTT COUNTY ON (105R00605N) HINTON RD PL
AT NS (CNO&TP) SYSTEM DN BRZ 263,149
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,754,325
Project Cost: 0 2,017,474 0
Scott 22119 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 FROM MILEPOINT 136.758 TO PL
MILEPOINT 138.424 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,400,000
Scott 80317 US-62 Improve safety and driver expectancy at the intersection of US 62 PL
(Paynes Depot Road), US 421 (Leestown Road), and Weisenberger DN STPF 520,000
Mill Road. (2024CCN) RW STPF 500,000
UT STPF 700,000
CN STPF 3,000,000
Project Cost: 520,000 500,000 3,700,000
Scott 80415 PF-9999 EXTEND LEXUS WAY (KY 3552) FROM CHERRY BLOSSOM WAY (US PL
62) TO OLD OXFORD ROAD (CS 1414) (NOTE: $2,043,200 DN SPP 1,250,000
($1,635,200 FEDERAL CONGRESSIONAL COMMUNITY PROJECT RW
FUNDS (CPF); AND $408,000 LOCAL MATCHING FUNDS PROVIDED
UT
BY CITY OF GEORGETOWN, KY) IS AVAILABLE FOR THE PROJECT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,250,000
Scott 80422 US-62 ROADSIDE SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON A PORTION OF US-62 PL
(MCCLELLAND CIR) ALONG BLEVINS LANE. DN
RW
UT
CN GR 45,000
Project Cost: 45,000 0 0
Total for Scott county PL
DN 520,000 263,149 1,740,000
RW 500,000
UT 700,000
CN 45,000 1,754,325 7,910,000
Total Amounts: 565,000 2,517,474 10,350,000

160 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Shelby 579 I -64 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-64 EB WELCOME CENTER. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Shelby 8713 US-60 CONSTRUCT A THIRD LANE ON US-60 FROM THE MASONIC HOME TO PL
ROCKET LANE. (12CCN)(14CCR)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 3,220,000
Project Cost: 3,220,000 0 0
Shelby 22029 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 43.77 TO MILEPOINT PL
46.303 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,400,000
Shelby 80312 PF-9999 IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM KY 53 AT THE OLD SEVEN MILE PIKE PL
INTERSECTION TO US 60/ROCKET LANE INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,800,000
Shelby 80318 KY-55 ADDRESS SAFETY AND IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW WITH PL
OPERATIONAL IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 55 AT OLD BRUNERSTOWN DN SPP 270,000
ROAD. THIS PROJECT WILL CONSIDER A RIGHT-TURN LANE ON SB RW SPP 60,000
KY 55. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 270,000 60,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 161
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Shelby 80326 US-60 CONSTRUCT PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES ON THE NORTH SIDE OF US 60 PL
FROM THE MASONIC HOME TO ROCKET LANE. (2024CCN) DN STP1 470,000
RW STP1 50,000
UT STP1 20,000
CN
Project Cost: 470,000 70,000 0
Shelby 80409 KY-55 Address safety, improve roadway geometrics, improve traffic PL
operations, and consider access management on KY 55 from south of DN SPP 610,000
Logan Station Road (MP 5.24) to the I-64 interchange (MP 6.03). RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 610,000
Shelby 80425 KY-362 Improve the intersection of KY 1531 (Aiken Road) and KY 362 (Ash PL
Avenue/Aiken Road) DN SPP 400,000
RW SPP 110,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 230,000 0
Shelby 80426 KY-362 Address safety and traffic operations on KY 362 (Aiken Road) at PL
Persimmon Ridge Drive (CR 1339) DN SPP 210,000
RW SPP 40,000
UT SPP 50,000
CN
Project Cost: 210,000 90,000 0
Total for Shelby county PL
DN 1,080,000 270,000 2,900,000
RW 200,000 60,000
UT 190,000
CN 4,380,000 4,910,000
Total Amounts: 5,460,000 660,000 7,870,000

162 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Simpson 8855 KY-1008 IMPROVE KY-1008 FROM KY-73 TO NORTH FRANKLIN STREET. PL
(14CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 4,600,000
Project Cost: 4,600,000 0 0
Simpson 80202 KY-100 SUPPLEMENTAL MOA FOR INDUSTRIAL ACCESS ROADS FOR PL
STONE-GIVENS PARK (2022CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 300,000
Project Cost: 300,000 0 0
Simpson 80413 PF-9999 Provide access from US 31W to proposed industrial park in the city of PL
Franklin by constructing a new four lane road with curb, gutter as well DN
as reconstruct and widen Steele Rd. (Memorandum of Agreement with RW CRP 20,000
the City of Franklin to construct, right of way to be donated)
UT CRP 300,000
CN CRP 8,343,800
Project Cost: 0 0 8,663,800
Simpson 80421 PF-9999 Construct 3,300 linear feet of new road from KY 100 west of Exit 6 to PL
KY 585. Minor widening of KY 585 and US 31W to provide turning DN SPP 500,000
lanes. (Memorandum of Agreement with the City of Franklin to RW SPP 150,000
construct, right of way to be donated)
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 500,000 2,650,000
Total for Simpson county PL
DN 500,000
RW 170,000
UT 800,000
CN 4,900,000 10,343,800
Total Amounts: 4,900,000 500,000 11,313,800

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 163
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Spencer 8955 KY-44 IMPROVE SAFETY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG PL
KY-44 NEAR DUTCHMAN CREEK ROAD. (16CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW CRP 220,000
UT CRP 300,000
CN CRP 3,260,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,780,000
Spencer 10094 KY-44 BRIDGE PROJECT IN SPENCER COUNTY ON (108B00008N) KY 44 AT PL
PLUM CREEK DN BRX 330,450
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,202,998
Project Cost: 0 2,533,448 0
Spencer 80316 KY-155 Improve safety at the intersection of KY 155 and KY PL
3192/Hochstrasser Road (MP 2.4-2.6) (2024CCN). Consider DN SPP 540,000
design/build. RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN SPP 5,000,000
Project Cost: 540,000 5,320,000 0
Spencer 80351 KY-155 Improve intersection of KY 155 and Goebel Road/Hochstrasser Road PL
(MP 0.65 - 0.85). (2024CCN). Consider design/build. DN SPP 330,000
RW SPP 160,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN SPP 1,250,000
Project Cost: 330,000 1,520,000 0
Total for Spencer county PL
DN 870,000 330,450
RW 370,000 220,000
UT 220,000 300,000
CN 8,452,998 3,260,000
Total Amounts: 870,000 9,373,448 3,780,000

164 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 65.1900 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY PL
2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 65.2000 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY PL
2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 65.2100 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS OFF SYSTEM BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 65.2200 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026-2032. (FBP PL
PROGRAM) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 65.2300 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026-2032. (FBP2 PL
PROGRAM) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 165
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 66.1900 CO-0 'ITS' AND 'TSMO' ACTIVITIES ON VARIOUS NHS ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2027 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 66.2100 CO-0 Transportation Systems Management and Operations (TSMO) activities PL
on various routes for FY-2022 through FY 2028. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 750,000 750,000
Project Cost: 0 750,000 750,000
Statewide 195.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES PROGRAM FOR FY PL
2026 THROUGH FY 2032 (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000
Project Cost: 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000
Statewide 219.1800 CO-0 NON-ATTAINMENT AREAS STATEWIDE CMAQ FUNDED PROJECTS PL
FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000
Project Cost: 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000
Statewide 224.1400 CO-0 PAVEMENT REHAB ON STATE (NON RS) SYSTEM ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000

166 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 239 CO-0 PROMOTING RESILIENT OPERATIONS FOR TRANSFORMATIVE, PL
EFFICIENT, AND COST SAVING TRANSPORTATION (PROTECT) DN
PROGRAM FORMULA FUNDS. RW
UT
CN PROT 20,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 20,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 244 CO-0 STATEWIDE CARBON REDUCTION PROGRAM. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN CARB 12,520,000 14,600,000 14,600,000
Project Cost: 12,520,000 14,600,000 14,600,000
Statewide 327.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 337.1500 CO-0 STATEWIDE I-STATE ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 346.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE OFF-SYSTEM BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Project Cost: 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 167
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 352.1600 CO-0 RAILWAY-HIGHWAY CROSSINGS PROGRAM ON VARIOUS ROUTES PL
FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN RRP 3,430,000 3,510,000
Project Cost: 3,430,000 3,510,000 0
Statewide 369.1000 CO-0 PAVEMENT REHABILITATION FOR VARIOUS NHS ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 388.1000 CO-0 OHIO RIVER BRIDGES FRACTURE CRITICAL FOR FY 2026 THROUGH PL
FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000
Project Cost: 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000
Statewide 391.0600 CO-0 STATEWIDE HIGHWAY PROJECT DESIGN ACTIVITIES FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN STPF 500,000 500,000 500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 500,000 500,000 500,000
Statewide 400.0700 CO-0 UPGRADE NAVIGATIONAL LIGHTING FOR BRIDGES OVER MAJOR PL
STREAMS AND WATERWAYS FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 500,000 500,000 500,000
Project Cost: 500,000 500,000 500,000

168 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 510.0500 CO-0 HONORING BORDER STATES COMMITMENTS FOR EXISTING PL
BRIDGES(CANNOT BE MOVED) FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Statewide 511.0400 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCK FALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION FOR FY 2022 THROUGH FY 2028. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 500,000 500,000 500,000
Project Cost: 500,000 500,000 500,000
Statewide 514.0100 CO-0 PREVENTATIVE MAINTENANCE FOR BRIDGE STRUCTURES FOR FY PL
2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Statewide 518.0100 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCKFALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION ON NH ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 518.0300 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCKFALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION ON NON NH ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY DN
2032. (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000
Project Cost: 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 169
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 600 CO-0 Statewide NHS Rest Area Repairs. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 601 CO-0 Additional Parking at NHS Rest Area and Weigh Stations. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 610 CO-0 ADDRESS SAFETY IMPROVEMENT NEEDS FOR STATE-OWNED DAMS PL
CONSTRUCTED TO FACILIATE KENTUCKY'S HIGHWAY SYSTEM. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,000,000 4,000,000
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 4,000,000
Statewide 911.0900 CO-0 STATEWIDE SAFETY PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(HSIP) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SAF 71,300,000 71,300,000 71,300,000
Project Cost: 71,300,000 71,300,000 71,300,000
Statewide 911.5000 CO-0 STATEWIDE SAFETY FUNDING TO BE USED ALONGSIDE FEDERAL PL
HSIP FUNDING TO ENHANCE ROADWAY SAFETY IN KENTUCKY. DN
(2022CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000

170 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 1063.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE UNDERWATER BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 1071.0800 CO-0 STATEWIDE PROGRAM TO FUND BRIDGE SCOUR PL
COUNTER-MEASURES FOR STATE-MAINTAINED BRIDGES FOR FY DN
2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Project Cost: 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Statewide 1074.0800 CO-0 STATEWIDE BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 2700.1400 CO-0 PAVEMENT PREVENTATIVE MAINTENANCE PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032 STP5 FUNDING. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Statewide 3011.0100 CO-0 AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT (ADA) TRANSITION PLAN PL
IMPLEMENTATION PROJECTS FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 171
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 3022 CO-0 Whitehaven Rest Area Renovation located between Exit 6 and Exit 7 PL
on Interstate 24 in Paducah, KY. (2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 980,000
Project Cost: 980,000 0 0
Statewide 8500.1600 CO-0 SCHOOL TURN LANE PROJECTS FOR NEW SCHOOLS FOR FY 2022 PL
THROUGH FY 2028. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 8600 CO-0 Western KY DECEMBER 2021 Tornado Relief Funding POOL FOR THE PL
LAST DOLLAR (UNCOVERED BY FEMA OR INSURANCE) DN
RECONCTRUCTION OF EXISTING ROADS. (2022CCR) (2024CCR)(SEE RW
GRAVES COUNTY 1-220.00 FOR MAYFIELD, KY KYD USDOT RAISE
UT
GRANT PROJECT)
CN SPP 1,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Statewide 8601 CO-0 ADVANCE CONSTRUCTION COMMITMENTS FOR MOUNTAIN PL
PARKWAY EXPANSION; I-65 CENTRAL CORRIDOR; AND OTHER DN
ACTIVE DESIGN/BUILD PROJECTS. RW
UT
CN NH 182,000,000 100,000,000 93,000,000
Project Cost: 182,000,000 100,000,000 93,000,000
Statewide 8602 CO-0 ADVANCE CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS FOR KY 536 IN NORTHERN PL
KENTUCKY, KY 32 IN MOREHEAD, AND OTHER ACTIVE STPF DN
PROJECTS PREVIOUSLY AUTHORIZED. RW
UT
CN STPF 6,000,000 21,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 21,000,000

172 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 9068.6100 CO-0 US 68/KY 80 LAKE BARKLEY AND KENTUCKY LAKE GARVEE BOND PL
DEBT SERVICE FOR FY 2027. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Statewide 9068.6600 CO-0 US 68/KY 80 LAKE BARKLEY AND KENTUCKY LAKE GARVEE BOND PL
DEBT SERVICE (STP) FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Statewide 9660 CO-0 GARVEE BOND DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS FOR THE BRENT SPENCE PL
BRIDGE PROJECT AND THE I-69 ORX BRIDGE PROJECT. DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 29,000,000 38,600,000
Project Cost: 0 29,000,000 38,600,000
Statewide 10003 CO-0 ADDRESS CIF (CONSTRAINT INDUCED FATIGUE) DETAILS ON PL
VARIOUS BRIDGES STATEWIDE DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 4,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000
Total for Statewide county PL
DN 500,000 500,000 500,000
RW
UT
CN 340,630,000 370,560,000 358,650,000
Total Amounts: 341,130,000 371,060,000 359,150,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 173
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Taylor 80154.3000KY-210 ADDRESS SAFETY ON KY 210 FROM JUST EAST OF CORINTH PL
CHURCH (MP0.60) TO KY 883 (MP14.20) IN TAYLOR COUNTY. DN SPP 3,120,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 3,120,000 0 0
Taylor 80257 KY-3350, EXTEND KY 3350 (CAMPBELLSVILLE BYPASS) FROM ky 289 TO US PL
PF-9999 68 ON THE EAST SIDE OF CAMPBELLSVILLE. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 1,560,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,560,000
Taylor 80420 KY-658 ADDRESS CONGESTION AND SAFETY ALONG KY 658 AND KY 3518 PL
IN CAMPBELLSVILLE BETWEEN US 68 AND KY 70 AND IMPROVE THE DN SPP 1,000,000
INTERSECTION AT US 68. (MP 0-0.665) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Taylor 80421 KY-210 Address congestion and improve intersections along KY 210 in PL
Campbellsville from Arbor Lane to US 68. (MP 15.669-16.626) DN SPP 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Total for Taylor county PL
DN 3,120,000 1,000,000 3,560,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 3,120,000 1,000,000 3,560,000

174 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Todd 10048 KY-848 BRIDGE PROJECT IN TODD COUNTY ON (110B00031N) KY-848 AT PL
SPRING CREEK DN BRX 130,320
RW
UT
CN BRX 868,802
Project Cost: 0 0 999,122
Todd 80402 US-79 Widen US 79 from MP 3.0 to Logan County line. (Estimates based on PL
preliminary engineering. Design funds allocated under Logan Co. Item DN
No. 03-80050) RW NH 5,700,000
UT NH 9,100,000
CN
Project Cost: 14,800,000 0 0
Todd 80422 KY-181 Improve safety and access on KY 181 from US 421 to Elkton city limits PL
(MP 0.21-10.955) DN SPP 4,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,600,000 0
Total for Todd county PL
DN 4,600,000 130,320
RW 5,700,000
UT 9,100,000
CN 868,802
Total Amounts: 14,800,000 4,600,000 999,122
Trigg 147 KY-139 Correct geometric deficiencies and address safety, mobility and PL
access issues along KY 139 from the intersection of KY 124 north of DN SPP 1,500,000
Cadiz to the I-24 Interchange in Caldwell Co (EMP 0.348) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 175
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Trigg 10182 KY-272 BRIDGE PROJECT IN TRIGG COUNTY ON (111B00009N) KY-272 AT PL
BURGE CREEK DN BRZ 269,786
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,798,571
Project Cost: 2,068,357 0 0
Trigg 80306 CR-1005 ADDRESS SAFETY CONCERNS ON GLENWOOD RD (CR-1005) FROM PL
KY 272 TO US 68/80 FROM MP 0.0 TO MP 2.1 (2024CCN) DN SPP 750,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 0
Total for Trigg county PL
DN 269,786 2,250,000
RW
UT
CN 1,798,571
Total Amounts: 2,068,357 2,250,000 0
Trimble 22100 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 38.086 TO PL
MILEPOINT 38.808 DN NHPM 380,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,780,000
Project Cost: 4,160,000 0 0
Trimble 80337 US-421 CONSTRUCT PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES ALONG US 421 FROM PL
CUTSHAW LANE TO TRIMBLE COUNTY HIGH SCHOOL/KY 625 AND DN SPP 430,000
ALONG KY 625 TO BEDFORD ELEMENTARY SCHOOL (TOTAL 0.983 RW
MI.) (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 430,000 0

176 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Trimble 80414 I-71 Improve safety and reduce congestion on I-71 from the Henry/Trimble PL
County line to the Trimble/Carroll County line. DN NH 700,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 700,000 0 0
Trimble 80415 US-421 Construct a realignment of US 421 through Milton between the PL SPP 500,000
Milton-Madison Bridge (MP 18.78) and extending south to reconnect to DN
the existing US 421 near MP 15.45. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Trimble 80434 KY-1838 Replace bridge (112B00017N) on KY 1838 at MP 2.18 PL
DN BRX 500,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 3,500,000
Project Cost: 0 500,000 3,500,000
Trimble 80435 KY-316 Replace bridge (112B00009N) at MP 1.554 PL
DN BRX 300,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 300,000 2,000,000
Total for Trimble county PL 500,000
DN 1,080,000 1,230,000
RW
UT
CN 3,780,000 5,500,000
Total Amounts: 4,860,000 1,730,000 5,500,000

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 177
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Union 80314 US-60 Reconstruct US 60 from Waverly to Corydon (2024CCN) PL
DN STP2 800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 800,000 0 0
Union 80315 US-60 Reconstruct US 60 from the Morganfield Bypass to Waverly. PL
(2024CCN) DN STP2 1,100,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,100,000 0
Total for Union county PL
DN 800,000 1,100,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 800,000 1,100,000 0
Warren 21 I -65 NEW I-65 INTERCHANGE IN SOUTHERN WARREN COUNTY NEAR PL
WOODBURN. (2024CCR) DN NH 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Warren 8818 KY-884 THREE SPRINGS ROAD EXTENSION FROM FLEALAND TO THE PL
NATCHER PARKWAY INCLUDING BRIDGE OVER PARKWAY. (14CCN) DN
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN HGC 11,780,000
Project Cost: 0 0 11,780,000

178 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 8853 US-31 WIDEN US-31W FROM WARREN/SIMPSON COUNTY LINE TO PL
BUCHANON PARK. (14CCN) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 18,720,000
Project Cost: 18,720,000 0 0
Warren 10053 CR-1388 BRIDGE PROJECT IN WARREN COUNTY ON (114C00016N) PL
GREENCASTLE RD AT TAYLOR BRANCH DN BRZ 157,458
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,049,720
Project Cost: 1,207,178 0 0
Warren 80052 KY-234 WIDEN KY-234 FROM MP 11.9 TO 12.4. IMPROVEMENTS MAY PL
INCLUDE A ROUNDABOUT, TURN LANE, AND A SIGNAL AT HAMPTON DN
DR. (18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,260,000
Project Cost: 1,260,000 0 0
Warren 80201 CR-1704, Reduce congestion and increase safety on Cave Mill Road/Dishman PL
CS-1432, Lane from the end of the three-lane section near Raintree Drive (MP DN
CS-2281 0.570) just east of Grider Pond Road. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 6,830,000
(Memorandum of Agreement with Warren County to construct and
UT
move right of way and utilities to 2027 and construction to 2028)
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,830,000 0
Warren 80203 US-31 Transpark: Improve mobility and reduce congestion on US-31W from PL
Mizpah Road to Freeport Road (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,630,000
Project Cost: 4,630,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 179
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 80214 KY-101 Construct a two-lane roundabout at the intersection of KY 101 and the PL
I-65 southbound entrance and exit ramps in Smiths Grove. Widen the DN
existing I-65 southbound exit ramp to two lanes and extend the RW SPP 2,370,000
beginning point if the ramp approximately five-hundred to
UT
one-thousand feet north. Widen approximately five hundred feet of
CN
Project Cost: 2,370,000 0 0
Warren 80301 CS-1334 MINOR WIDENING OF CS-1344/CR1235 (SMALLHOUSE RD) FROM PL
ELROD RD TO US 231 (CAMPBELL LANE). SCOPE INCLUDES DN SPP 1,940,000
INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENTS, CONTINUOUS CENTER TURN LANE. RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,940,000 0
Warren 80326 PF-9999 SCOPING STUDY FOR OUTER BELTLINE EXTENDING KY 3145 TO PL
NORTHERN WARREN COUNTY. (2024CCN) DN STPF 7,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,500,000 0
Total for Warren county PL
DN 157,458 9,440,000 2,000,000
RW 2,370,000 6,830,000
UT
CN 25,659,720 11,780,000
Total Amounts: 28,187,178 16,270,000 13,780,000
Washington 164.2000 KY-555 IMPROVE MOBILITY ON THE KY 555 HEARTLAND PARKWAY PL
CORRIDOR FROM KY 53 TO BLUEGRASS PARKWAY (2022CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT NH 4,500,000
CN NH 5,000,000
Project Cost: 4,500,000 5,000,000 0

180 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Washington 396.3000 US-150 ADDRESS SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND GEOMETRIC ISSUES ALONG US PL
150 IN WASHINGTON COUNTY FROM 0.7 MILES EAST OF GRUNDY DN STPF 500,000
HOME ROAD (MILEPOINT 2.50) TO US 150X (MP 6.557) AT THE OLD RW
ST. CATHERINE'S COLLEGE. (2016BOP) (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT STPF 1,500,000
CN STPF 5,000,000
Project Cost: 500,000 1,500,000 5,000,000
Washington 20042 KY-528 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-528 FROM MILEPOINT 1.4 TO MILEPOINT PL
1.8 DN STP4 16,250
RW
UT
CN STP4 308,750
Project Cost: 325,000 0 0
Washington 80350 CR-1031 Replacement of an existing metal truss bridge that has been down PL
rated by KYDOT to 5-tons at MP 1.983 on Sulphur Lick Road (CR DN FBP2 154,927
1031). RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,032,850
Project Cost: 0 0 1,187,777
Washington 80410 US-150 IMPROVEMENTS TO THE INTERSECTIONS OF US 150 AT KY 55 AND PL
AT KY 528 NEAR SPRINGFIELD DN SPP 500,000
RW SPP 100,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN SPP 3,500,000
Project Cost: 0 4,350,000 0
Washington 80422 KY-55 Install southbound right turn lane on KY 55 at Booker Road (MP PL
3.485-3.523) DN SPP 50,000
RW
UT SPP 50,000
CN SPP 100,000
Project Cost: 0 200,000 0
Total for Washington county PL
DN 516,250 550,000 154,927
RW 100,000
UT 4,500,000 1,800,000
CN 308,750 8,600,000 6,032,850
Total Amounts: 5,325,000 11,050,000 6,187,777

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 181
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Wayne 80005 KY-1275 IMPROVE CURVE ON KY 1275 AT KY 833/ROGERS GROVE ROAD PL
AND RESURFACE FROM KY 1275 FROM BELL LANE TO KY DN CRP 100,000
833/ROGERS GROVE ROAD(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW CRP 1,000,000
UT CRP 60,000
CN CRP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,160,000
Wayne 80006 KY-1275 Reduce congestion and improve safety, capacity, and mobility along PL
KY 1275, including sidewalks, from KY 90 to Bell Lane. (18CCN) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW CRP 500,000
UT
CN CRP 3,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,500,000
Wayne 80105 KY-90 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVES SAFETY, CAPACITY AND PL
MOBILITY OF KY 90 BETWEEN KY 90X/KY 1275 AND KY 3106 DN
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 0
Wayne 80108 KY-90, KY-92 ADDRESS SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND CONNECTIVITY BY RELOCATING PL
ALONG KY 92 IN MONTICELLO BETWEEN LOCUST ST AND ELK DN
SPRINGS CREEK RD (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW CRP 1,166,000
UT CRP 874,500
CN CRP 4,860,000
Project Cost: 0 6,900,500 0
Wayne 80307 KY-90 Reduce congestion and improve safety along KY 90 from 0.284 mile PL
West of KY 92 to 0.084 mile West of KY 92. (2024CCN) DN SPP 150,000
RW SPP 200,000
UT SPP 240,000
CN SPP 690,000
Project Cost: 150,000 440,000 690,000

182 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Wayne 80309 KY-90 MINOR WIDENING BY ADDING OFFSET LEFT TURNING LANES INTO KY PL
1568 AND FRAZER CHAPEL ROAD. (2024CCN) DN SPP 200,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 200,000 0 0
Wayne 80314 KY-92 IMPROVE VERTICAL GEOMETRICS ALONG KY 92 NEAR KY 789 TO PL
IMPROVE SIGHT DISTANCE. ADD TURNING LANES AND MINOR DN SPP 1,360,000
WIDENING FROM ALONG KY 92 FROM 789 TO KY 90. (2024CCI) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,360,000 0
Wayne 80315 CR-1127 BRIDGE REPLACEMENT OVER LITTLE SOUTH FORK ALONG BALDY PL
ROAD (CR 1127), DN FBP2 164,487
RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,096,582
Project Cost: 0 0 1,261,069
Wayne 80408 KY-90 Improve mobility and safety along KY 90 at KY 3284 / KY 90X and PL
widen approach routes approximately 1500 feet on each side of KY DN SPP 180,000
90 in Monticello. RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 180,000 0 0
Total for Wayne county PL
DN 530,000 1,360,000 264,487
RW 6,366,000 1,500,000
UT 1,114,500 60,000
CN 4,860,000 6,786,582
Total Amounts: 530,000 13,700,500 8,611,069

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 183
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Webster 228 KY-138 RECONSTRUCT BETWEEN KY 120 AND RR BRIDGE AT SLAUGHTERS PL
TO ALLEVIATE FLOODING. (12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN SPP 200,000
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 200,000 0 0
Webster 22091 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 133.686 TO PL
MILEPOINT 134.982 DN NHPM 160,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 1,558,266
Project Cost: 0 1,718,266 0
Total for Webster county PL
DN 200,000 160,000
RW
UT
CN 1,558,266
Total Amounts: 200,000 1,718,266 0
Whitley 4328 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Whitley 4337 KY-727 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-727 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0

184 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 4363 KY-836 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-836 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Whitley 4389 KY-204 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-204 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Whitley 4390 KY-26 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-26 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Whitley 4391 KY-478 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-478 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Whitley 4392 KY-856 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-856 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 185
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 80107 US-25 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 25W (MILEPOINT 13.3 TO PL
MILEPOINT 14.6) INCLUDED IN THIS RECONSTRUCTION WILL BE DN STP1 1,500,000
APPROXIMATELY 1.3 MILES OF ROADWAY TO BE RW
WIDENED/IMPROVED, AN APPROXIMATELY 250' BRIDGE
UT
REPLACEMENT OVER WATTS CREEK,INTERSECTIONS OF KY 26 AND
CN
Project Cost: 1,500,000 0 0
Whitley 80264 KY-92 RECONFIGURE EXISTING INTERSECTION OF KY 92 AND PENNY LANE PL
TO IMPROVE SAFETY ALONG AT INTERSECTION. CONSTRUCT NEW DN
CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN KY 92 AND PENNY LANE. RW
RECONFIGURE TRAFFIC OPERATION ALONG PENNY LANE BETWEEN
UT
KY 92 AND NEW CONNECTOR ROAD (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Whitley 80351 CS-2000 Develop and evaluate potential intersection alternatives (including a PL
roundabout) to improve traffic flow at the intersection of Arena Drive DN
(CS 2000) and Corbin Center Drive. (2024CCN) RW CRP 110,000
UT CRP 260,000
CN CRP 1,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,870,000
Whitley 80353 I -75 Widen I-75 from MP 19.2 in Whitley County to MP 23.5 South of Corbin PL
(2024CCN) DN NH 2,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,600,000
Whitley 80414 CS-2000 Construct new access to Corbin Arena to help with ingress and PL
egress. Memorandum of Agreement with City of Corbin to construct. DN SPP 750,000
RW SPP 650,000
UT SPP 415,000
CN SPP 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,400,000 6,415,000

186 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 80415 US-25 Improve safety by reconstructing intersection of US-25W and Angel PL
Road DN NH 350,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 350,000 0 0
Whitley 80417 CR-1305 Safety improvements & congestion relief on KY92 by providing PL
circulation through the corridor DN SPP 637,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 637,000 0 0
Whitley 80427 US-25 Intersection Improvements on 18th Street (US 25W) PL
DN SPP 150,000
RW SPP 1,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,150,000 0
Whitley 80429 KY-830 North Hamlin Ave/Roy Kidd Ave intersection realignment to include PL
curb & gutter and sidewalks on each side DN SPP 100,000
RW SPP 75,000
UT SPP 190,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 175,000 190,000
Whitley 80430 CS-2212 Sight distance improvement on Depot Street (CS 2212) PL
DN SPP 100,000
RW SPP 75,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 500,000
Project Cost: 100,000 1,075,000 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 187
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 80431 CS-2028 Re-establish Frank Selvy Way (CS 2180) as 14 feet one way PL
vehicular lane, relocate pole near Barbourville St. Bridge and DN SPP 100,000
intersection improvements at Roy Kidd Ave and South Laurel Ave. RW SPP 80,000
UT SPP 150,000
CN SPP 300,000
Project Cost: 100,000 230,000 300,000
Total for Whitley county PL
DN 2,687,000 1,000,000 2,600,000
RW 1,880,000 110,000
UT 650,000 865,000
CN 150,000 500,000 9,800,000
Total Amounts: 2,837,000 4,030,000 13,375,000
Wolfe 177 KY-15 Minor widening to improve redundancy of Regional travel. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW PROT 290,000
UT PROT 560,000
CN
Project Cost: 850,000 0 0
Wolfe 80417 KY-191 Reconstruct KY 191 from the Mountain Parkway Exit/Underpass to KY PL SPP 190,000
3356 (MP 3.096 - 6.808) DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 190,000 0 0
Wolfe 80418 KY-191 Hill and curve correction on KY 191 between Hazel Green and KY 205 PL
(02CCN)(08CCR)(10CCR). THIS PROJECT REPLACES SYP 10-8102. DN SPP 400,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 0

188 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Wolfe county PL 190,000
DN 400,000
RW 290,000
UT 560,000
CN
Total Amounts: 1,040,000 400,000 0
Woodford 117 US-60 IMPROVE US 60 (VERSAILLES ROAD) FROM THE BLUEGRASS PL
PARKWAY/HUNTERTOWN PIKE TO PISGAH PIKE. DN
RW NH 1,070,000
UT NH 2,340,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,070,000 2,340,000
Woodford 8908 EXTEND FALLING SPRINGS BLVD FROM TYRONE PIKE (US-62) TO PL
CLIFTON ROAD (KY-1964) DN SPP 1,020,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,020,000 0
Woodford 22033 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 59.431 TO PL
MILEPOINT 64.856 DN NHPM 3,190,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 31,930,000
Project Cost: 0 0 35,120,000
Woodford 80200 KY-1659 Reconstruct McCracken Pike (KY-1659) on a new horizontal alignment PL
to minimize pedestrian and vehicle conflicts near Woodford Reserve DN
Distillery (ROW to be provided by County) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 330,000
CN
Project Cost: 330,000 0 0

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN 189
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Woodford 80353 US-60 Additional turn lanes and road improvement to US 60 at MP 6.1 for PL
entrance to Livestock Innovation Center at UK (2024CCN) DN CRP 220,000
RW
UT
CN CRP 1,150,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,370,000
Woodford 80400 KY-2113 Intersection improvements at KY 2113/US 62 and KY2113/KY 33. PL
Consider design/build. DN SPP 500,000
RW SPP 500,000
UT SPP 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 500,000 650,000 0
Total for Woodford county PL
DN 500,000 1,020,000 3,410,000
RW 1,570,000
UT 330,000 150,000 2,340,000
CN 33,080,000
Total Amounts: 830,000 2,740,000 38,830,000

190 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
Biennium Fund Summary
Fund Description FY 2027 FY 2028 Total
APD APD 7,320,000 15,000,000 22,320,000
BRO BRO 103,656,111 111,331,706 214,987,817
BRO2 BRO2 30,865,000 3,005,000 33,870,000
BRX BRX 84,997,786 105,624,826 190,622,612
BRZ BRZ 19,219,492 19,290,606 38,510,098
CARB CARB 14,600,000 14,600,000 29,200,000
CM CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 16,200,000
CRP CRP 74,690,500 154,923,500 229,614,000
FBP FBP 100,066,318 103,215,370 203,281,688
FBP2 FBP2 12,242,281 20,483,063 32,725,344
GAR GAR 41,000,000 38,600,000 79,600,000
GR GR 1,280,000 0 1,280,000
HGC HGC 118,470,000 15,760,000 134,230,000
IF IF 241,960,000 84,000,000 325,960,000
KYD KYD 27,890,000 0 27,890,000
NH NH 360,160,500 216,775,900 576,936,400
NHPM NHPM 87,832,108 163,651,442 251,483,550
PROT PROT 26,580,000 12,000,000 38,580,000
RRP RRP 3,510,000 0 3,510,000
RRS RRS 710,000 5,300,000 6,010,000
SAF SAF 71,300,000 71,300,000 142,600,000
SAH SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 3,600,000
SGF SGF 125,000,000 0 125,000,000
SLO SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 53,600,000
SLX SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 15,600,000
SNK SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 17,200,000
SPP SPP 208,309,600 102,896,000 311,205,600
STP1 STP1 50,460,000 16,521,200 66,981,200
STP2 STP2 40,550,000 38,800,000 79,350,000
STP3 STP3 8,130,000 6,000,000 14,130,000
STP4 STP4 350,000 2,915,726 3,265,726
STP5 STP5 21,851,750 10,502,300 32,354,050
STPF STPF 119,653,000 97,740,000 217,393,000
TAP TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 24,600,000

Total Amount 191
2,068,054,446 1,495,636,639 3,563,691,085

192 2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
Fund Summary
Fund Description FY 2026 FY 2027 FY 2028 Total
APD APD 1,560,000 7,320,000 15,000,000 23,880,000
BRO BRO 75,042,195 103,656,111 111,331,706 290,030,012
BRO2 BRO2 4,000,000 30,865,000 3,005,000 37,870,000
BRX BRX 77,309,615 84,997,786 105,624,826 267,932,227
BRZ BRZ 17,554,352 19,219,492 19,290,606 56,064,450
CARB CARB 14,600,000 14,600,000 14,600,000 43,800,000
CM CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000 24,300,000
CRP CRP 0 74,690,500 154,923,500 229,614,000
FBP FBP 78,809,513 100,066,318 103,215,370 282,091,201
FBP2 FBP2 16,537,927 12,242,281 20,483,063 49,263,271
GAR GAR 0 41,000,000 38,600,000 79,600,000
GR GR 8,865,000 1,280,000 0 10,145,000
HGC HGC 80,870,000 118,470,000 15,760,000 215,100,000
IF IF 0 241,960,000 84,000,000 325,960,000
KYD KYD 151,861,000 27,890,000 0 179,751,000
NH NH 330,411,200 360,160,500 216,775,900 907,347,600
NHPM NHPM 183,879,168 87,832,108 163,651,442 435,362,718
PROT PROT 21,676,000 26,580,000 12,000,000 60,256,000
RRP RRP 3,430,000 3,510,000 0 6,940,000
RRS RRS 790,000 710,000 5,300,000 6,800,000
SAF SAF 72,340,000 71,300,000 71,300,000 214,940,000
SAH SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000 5,400,000
SGF SGF 150,000,000 125,000,000 0 275,000,000
SLO SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000 80,400,000
SLX SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000 23,400,000
SNK SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000 25,800,000
SPP SPP 144,027,000 208,309,600 102,896,000 455,232,600
STP1 STP1 27,390,000 50,460,000 16,521,200 94,371,200
STP2 STP2 75,000,000 40,550,000 38,800,000 154,350,000
STP3 STP3 8,000,000 8,130,000 6,000,000 22,130,000
STP4 STP4 7,625,000 350,000 2,915,726 10,890,726
STP5 STP5 1,750,000 21,851,750 10,502,300 34,104,050
STPF STPF 47,957,000 119,653,000 97,740,000 265,350,000
TAP TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000 36,900,000
Total Amount 1,666,684,970 2,068,054,446 1,495,636,639 5,230,376,055